                                                                 EnglishTestPrepReview

                                                               1000 Words You Must Know

   Posted in English: Vocabulary Strategies
1000 Words You Must Know to Pass Any Standardized Test

   The following 1000 words often appeared on most standardized tests. Research has repeatedly demonstrated that a high vocabulary is the most
   accurate indicator of potential academic success. Thus, the following 1,000 words will certainly aid in increasing your personal readiness for
   high academics and tests.

   Study tip: Read each complete entry a minimum of five (5) times, while attempting to memorize the words and the understood messages in each
   sentence. Also, writing your personal version of each sentence will aid in the indelible impression that each message can make. Albeit, there is
   certainly no more productive means of concrete vocabulary acquisition than the actual use of the terms in your daily verbal or written
   communiqués!

                                                                         A --

   1. abase (v.) to humiliate, to degrade

   Though Brutus, a twice-held-back bully, tried his best to verbally abase  Travis and the kids he played with, nothing he said seemed to matter to
   any of them.

   2. abate (v.) to reduce or to lessen

   The rain poured down like a broken dike for a long while; then, as the clouds began to move on, it slowly abated.

   3. abdicate (v.) to give up a position, usually one of great power or authority

   When King John realized that his enemies would ultimately win, he abdicated  his throne and hid himself away.

   4. abduct (v.) to kidnap, take by force

   During their holy festival, the king’s ancient enemies abducted the beautiful Princess Kristiana from her castle chamber.

   5. aberration (n.) something that differs from what’s normal

   The doctor’s ill-tempered behavior was thought to be nothing more than an aberration, that is, until it continued for a full calendar year.

   6. abet (v.) to aid, assist, encourage

   The spy escaped only because he had a secret friend on the inside to aid and abet his efforts.

   7. abhor (v.) to hate, detest

   Because he wound up tripping himself constantly when he tried to play touch football, Ray began toabhor his favorite sport.

   8. abide a. (v.) to put up with; b. (v.) to remain

   a. Normally, Chuck would never abide  such conduct; but, decided to this time because of the strain the girls have been under recently.

   b. Despite the beating they’ve taken from the weather throughout the ages, the grandest of all the mountain chains, the mighty Rockies,
   yet abide.

   9. abject (adj.) wretched, pitiful

   After losing all her money, Martha fell into abject poverty, having nothing left of value.

   10. abjure (v.) to reject, renounce

   To prove his honesty, the President abjured  the evil policies of his wicked predecessor.

   11. abnegation (n.) denial of comfort to oneself

   The zealot slept only on the floor, took only cold showers, and followed religiously many other practices of abnegation and self denial.

   12. abort (v.) to give up on a half-finished project or effort

   After they ran out of food, the men, attempting to jog around the country, had to abort
   their task and go home.

   13. abridge a. (v.) to cut down, shorten; b. (adj.) shortened

   a. The publisher thought the new compendium was much too long and abridged it.

   b. War and Peace is such an epic tale, even the abridged version is long and detailed.

   14. abrogate (v.) to abolish, usually by authority

   The Constitution assures that the United States government cannot abrogate our rights.

   15. abscond (v.) to sneak away and hide

   In the confusion, James Bond absconded into the night with the top secret codes.

   16. absolution (n.) freedom from blame, guilt, sin

   Once all the real facts were in, the prudent jury granted Mr. Clydette complete and total absolution, rendering a verdict of not guilty.

   17. abstain (v.) to freely choose not to commit an action

   Everyone demanded Angus to put on the kilt, but he did not want to, so he abstained.

   18. abstruse (adj.) hard to comprehend

   Everyone else in the classroom understood geometry and algebra with ease, but poor John found the entire subject most abstruse.

   19. accede (v.) to agree 

   Surprisingly, the coach acceded to the players’ request to miss practice to go to a party.

   20. accentuate (v.) to stress, highlight 

   Motivational speakers all agree that success in life means accentuating the positives while learning from then dismissing the negatives.

   21. accessible (adj.) obtainable, reachable

   After studying from this list and getting a great score on his standardized test, Kayden realized that his greatest academic goal was
   then accessible.

   22. acclaim (n.) high praise

   Greg’s excellent short story won great acclaim from the literary community.

   23. accolade (n.) high praise, special distinction

   Everyone offered accolades to Samson after he defeated his enemies in battle.

   24. accommodating (adj.) helpful, obliging, polite

   Though the apartment was not big enough for everyone to be comfortable, the good friends were very considerate and accommodating to each other.

   25. accord (n.) an agreement

   After months of negotiating, the former enemies struck an accord that benefitted them both.

   26. accost (v.) to confront verbally

   Though Alecia was normally quite verbose and aggressive, when the clumsy waiter spilled soup on her for the third time, she didn’t accost him in
   the least.

   27. accretion (n.) slow growth in size or amount

   Giant stalactites are formed in the roofs of caves and caverns by the accretion of dripping mineral-laden water.

   28. acerbic (adj.) biting, bitter in tone or taste

   Jack became intensely acerbic and began to cruelly and vindictively make fun of all his buddies.

   29. acquiesce (v.) to agree without protesting

   Though Mr. Cold wanted to stay inside and work in his office, he acquiesced  to his wife’s demands to “Come on out and eat it while it’s hot!”

   30. acrimony (n.) bitterness, discord

   Acrimony enveloped the friendship of Lisdanay and Terri after they both fell for Alvin.

   31. acumen (n.) keen insight

   Because of her linguistic acumen, Lois the Loquacious was able to create in minutes manners of expression that took other students many hours.

   32. acute a. (adj.) sharp, severe; b. (adj.) having keen insight

   a.) Adam could not walk because the pain in his left foot was so acute.
   b.) Because she was so acute, Lorraine quickly discerned the magician’s saw-the- woman-in-half magic trick.

   33. adamant (adj.) impervious, immovable, unyielding

   Though public pressure was intense, and the across-the-isle foes relentless, Obama remained adamant about his latest proposal.

   34. adept (adj.) extremely skilled

   Tarzan was very adept at jumping from tree to tree just like Cheetah, his pet Chimp.

   35. adhere a. (n.) to stick to something; b. (n.) to follow devoutly

   a.) We adhered to our plan; for, desperation had set in, robbing us of our waywardness.

   b.) Henry adhered to the dictates of his religion without any question or shade of doubt.

   36. admonish (v.) to caution, criticize, reprove

   Joe’s mother admonished him not to ruin his appetite by eating dessert before dinner.

   37. adorn (v.) to decorate

   We adorned the tree with many colorful ornaments: ribbons, bows, and bells.

   38. adroit (adj.) skillful, dexterous

   The adroit card shark could deal easily from the bottom of the deck with no one noticing, not even when they expected what was happening.

   39. adulation (n.) extreme praise

   Though the play was excellent, Martin didn’t think it deserved the overwhelming adulation it received from its writers.

   40. adumbrate (v.) to sketch out in a vague way

   The coach adumbrated his game plan; none of the players were ready for its unorthodox twists and turns.

   41. adverse (adj.) antagonistic, unfavorable, dangerous

   Because of adverse conditions, the novice hikers decided to give up trying to climb the mountain.

   42. advocate a. (v.) to argue in favor of; b. (n.) a person who argues in favor

   a.) Alvin advocated turning left at the stop sign, even though everyone else thought they should turn right.

   b.) In addition to wanting to turn left at every stop sign, Alvin was an advocate of eating hamburgers at every meal as a wonderful way to
   support the U.S. cattle industry.

   43. aerial (adj.) somehow related to the air 

   We watched as the F-15 fighters conducted ultra sophisticated aerial acrobatics.

   44. aesthetic (adj.) artistic, related to one’s sense of beauty

   We hired Susan, an interior decorator, because she had a wonderful sense of aesthetics.

   45. affable (adj.) friendly, amiable

   Everyone likes to be around Jorge because he is so affable and kind-hearted.

   46. affinity (n.) a spontaneous feeling of closeness

   Jerry didn’t know why, but he felt an incredible affinity toward Karen, his new friend.

   47. affluent (adj.) rich, wealthy

   Mrs. Gregory was affluent, owning a huge house, a yacht, and a small Pacific island.

   48. affront (n.) an insult

   Albert was very touchy, and took any slight word as a major affront to his supposed honor and dignity.

   49. aggrandize (v.) to increase or make greater

   Joseph always mentioned the nicknames of his famous friends as a way to aggrandize his personal standing and reputation.

   50. aggregate a. (n.) a whole or total; b. (v.) to gather into a mass

   a.) The three branches of the U.S. Government form an aggregate that's much more powerful than any of its individual parts.

   b.) To make any possible rebellion attempt fruitless, the wicked dictator decided to disaggregate as many people from their community support
   groups as he possibly could.

   51. aggrieved (adj.) distressed, wronged, injured

   The self-important, officious foreman overworked his aggrieved employees as soon as his promotion was final.

   52. agile (adj.) quick, nimble

   The old grey hounds were far too slow to catch the agile young vixens.

   53. agnostic (adj.) doubting the existence of God

   Joey’s parents are very religious, but he is agnostic, searching for greater proof.

   54. agriculture (n.) farming

   It was a huge step in the progress of civilization when tribesmen turned to agriculture
   and started to grow their own food.

   55. aisle (n.) a passageway between rows of seats

   Once the bride got inside the auditorium, she moon-walked down the aisle to the beat of
   Billie Jean.

   56. alacrity (n.) eagerness, speed

   When Kevin’s dad asked him to cut the grass, he did it with great alacrity; because, the new girl next door was standing outside watching.

   57. alias (n.) a false name or identity

   Samuel tried to sneak into a frat party, using an alias and a fake ID.

   58. allay (v.) to soothe, ease , put to rest

   The police chief gave a fiery speech to try to allay the fears of his officers when they learned of the escape of the city’s worst nemesis ever.

   59. allege (v.) to assert, usually without proof

   The detective alleged that Carl was the perpetrator; however, after the investigation turned up no evidence, Carl was set free.

   60. alleviate (v.) to relieve, make more bearable

   This information will alleviate the fears of the soldiers, but only for a while.

   61. allocate (v.) to distribute, set aside

   The president allocated  25 percent of the nation’s budget to improve the school system.

   62. aloof (adj.) reserved, distant

   The brilliant scientist seemed so aloof, when he was preoccupied with astronomical equations.

   63. altercation (n.) a dispute, fight

   Jack and Jill blamed everybody but themselves for the altercation  they had on the hill.

   64. amalgamate (v.) to bring together, unite

   Because of her great charisma, the mayoral candidate was able to amalgamate all of the city officials into a formidable campaign committee.

   65. ambiguous (adj.) uncertain, variably interpretable

   Dr. Jones’s answer to the question was much too ambiguous to satisfy his critics.

   66. ambivalent (adj.) having opposing feelings

   My feelings for my X are truly ambivalent; love and hate in tandem dominate my heart.

   67. ameliorate (v.) to improve

   The tension and mistrust in the air was ameliorated when the CEO announced that the bonus was going to be divided evenly.

   68. amenable (adj.) willing, compliant
   My teacher was amenable to the idea that his best students should be honored at the assembly.

   69. amenity (n.) an item that increases comfort

   Oprah’s guest house is decked with a multitude of amenities - gadgets and toys galore.

   70. amiable (adj.) friendly

   An amiable chap, Herbert Billingsworth got along smashingly with everyone he met.

   71. amicable (adj.) friendly

   Connie wanted an amiable separation; but, her violent boyfriend, Brutus, refused to be amicable.

   72. amorous (adj.) showing love, particularly affectionate

   Ray saw Pam wearing her slinky red dress; his amorous heart began to palpitate out of control.

   73. amorphous (adj.) without a fixed or definitive shape or type

   The amorphous nature of gases causes them to be the unparalleled paragons of shape- shifters.

   74. anachronistic (adj.) out of its proper time

   Dinosaurs in downtown West Palm Beach would certainly constitute a monumental anachronistic event.

   75. analgesic (n.) something that reduces pain

   The injured athlete cried for his analgesic, saying, “The pain is unbearable. Stop it! Stop it!”

   76. analogous (adj.) similar to, so that an analogy can be drawn

   Though they are not the same shape, the structure of a rectangle is analogous angle-wise to that of a square.

   77. anarchist (n.) one who opposes and wants to eliminate all forms of government and law

   True to the nature of every anarchist, Boris challenged the existence of every kind of government on the planet.

   78. anathema (n.) something cursed, a detestable person

   “I never want to see that murderer. He is anathema to me -- cursed forever, he is!” exclaimed the unforgiving widow.

   79. anecdote (n.) a short, humorous account

   Billy’s quaint Southern anecdote had his sophisticated hostess rolling on the floor, breathless and teary-eyed.

   80. anesthesia (n.) a substance that causes loss of sensation

   When the pain became unbearable, the nurse administered a stronger anesthesia to the operating site.

   81. anguish (n.) extreme sadness, torment

   Beatrice went through awful anguish when she was first confronted with the truth of her condition.

   82. animated (adj.) lively

   Today’s animated cartoons are the most life-like ever, touching all modern situations with virtual perfection.

   83. annex a. (v.) to incorporate a space; b. (n.) a space attached to a larger space

   a.) After lengthy debate and compromise, the United States annexed Alaska, making it our largest state.

   b.) They have learned to do their studying in a little annex attached to their bedroom.

   84. annul (v.) to make void or invalid

   Annulling a bad law becomes an easy chore once the majority of the population recognizes it as hurtful to the innocent.

   85. anomaly (n.) something that does not fit into the normal order

   “Such a spatial anomaly could account for these so-called ripples in time,” said Mr. Spock to his noble and heroic captain.

   86. anonymous (adj.) being unknown, unrecognized

   Mary received a love poem from a somewhat anonymous admirer, her romantically minded hubby.

   87. antagonism (n.) hostility

   Spiderman’s greatest and most bizarre nemesis, Doctor Octopus, provided such

   antagonism that the superhero was pushed to his limits time and again.

   88. antecedent (n.) something that came before

   Many of the great traditions of Western culture had their antecedent birth in the culture of Ancient Greece.

   89. antediluvian (adj.) ancient; before Noah’s flood

   The antediluvian society of Babel vanished without a trace thanks to the incredible force and pressure of the great flood!

   90. anthology (n.) a selected collection of writings, songs, etc.
   The new anthology of Smokey Robinson songs is now available at a store near you!

   91. antipathy (n.) a strong dislike, repugnance

   My antipathy grows for Helen each time I remember her terrible, mean-spirited words to me.

   92. antiquated (adj.) old, out of date

   Calculators have quickly become antiquated tools, just like the typewriter that my parents used.

   93. antiseptic (adj.) clean, sterile

   The antiseptic gauze kept Bob’s wound clean and germ-free until the doctor could see him.

   94. antithesis (n.) the absolute opposite
   Cold, hard hatred is the antithesis of warm, soft adoration.

   95. anxiety (n.) intense uneasiness

   Because final test scores would be posted at 5:05 p.m., every student’s anxiety level peaked around 5:04.

   96. apathetic (adj.) lacking concern, non-emotional
   Disinterested in academics, Kerry was totally apathetic about the causes of the rise and fall of the Roman Empire.

   97. apocryphal (adj.) probably fictitious, probably false or wrong

   Some of the tales of monsters and demons may easily be true; albeit, many of them are apocryphal at best.

   98. appalling (adj.) inspiring shock, horror, disgust

   The jury thought the defendant’s account was cold-hearted; thus, they were deeply appalled and found him guilty as charged.

   99. appease (v.) to calm, satisfy

   Lavish gifts were prepared for the angry monarch, hoping to appease his wrath.

   100. appraise (v.) to assess worth or value

   A real estate assessor will be here to appraise this house around 3:00 p.m.

   101. apprehend a. (v.) to seize, arrest; b. (v.) to perceive, understand, grasp

   a.) The criminal was apprehended trying to flee from the scene of the crime.

   b.) Apprehending philosophical concepts is the domain of those in pursuit of truth.

   102. approbation (n.) praise

   The President heaped great approbation upon the fire fighter that saved a child.

   103. appropriate (v.) to take and make use of

   Uncle Sam appropriated the fissionable material without delay or explanation.

   104. aquatic (adj.) relating to water

   A marine biologist studies aquatic creatures and reports findings to the curious minded.

   105. arable (adj.) suitable for growing crops

   American farmers seek out arable land with the same way gusto that the early prospectors sought out gold mines.

   106. arbiter (n.) one who can resolve a dispute or make a decision

   The wise arbiter granted the east side of the island to its original owners, and the balance he gave to the newcomers.

   107. arbitrary (adj.) based on random factors

   The man’s decision was totally arbitrary, being predicated on nothing.

   108. arbitration (n.) the process or act of resolving a dispute

   The plaintiffs sought immediate arbitration when a judge gave them a hint of an unfavorable ruling.

   109. arboreal (adj.) of or relating to trees

   Arboreal creatures live in the trees of every country on Earth.

   110. arcane (adj.) obscure, secret, known only by a few

   The professor of ancient writings suggested that the tablet was arcane but somewhat decipherable.

   111. archaic (adj.) of or relating to an earlier period in time, outdated

   Because of the micro-chip, machines like the typewriter will soon be archaic.

   112. archetypal (adj.) the most representative or typical example of something

   The image of an aging Einstein has become the archetypal image of every genius.

   113. ardor (n.) extreme vigor, energy, enthusiasm

   The ground troops conveyed their intense ardor for battle, as they scraped their swords against the stone pillars.

   114. arid (adj.) excessively dry

   The great deserts are the most arid places on our whole planet, allowing cactus only to thrive and the occasional scorpion.

   115. arrogate (v.) to take without justification

   With his stiff chin raised, the self righteous monarch arrogated the right to determine what the truth should be in his kingdom.

   116. artifact (n.) a remaining piece from an extinct culture or place

   Archeologists crave artifacts the way paleontologists crave the bones of dinosaurs.

   117. artisan (n.) a craftsman

   The artisans of ancient Greece fashioned chests and cabinets fit for the king’s palace.

   118. ascertain (v.) to perceive, to receive, to learn

   Thinking he could ascertain the codes to the alarm, the thief slipped silently into the bank president’s office.

   119. ascetic (adj.) practicing restraint as a means of self-discipline, usually religious

   Serious Christians live ascetic  lifestyles, denying themselves all of the sinful pleasures that abound in our land.

   120. ascribe (v.) to assign, credit, attribute to

   True wisdom has been ascribed  to those who seek goodness, truth, and virtue above all else.

   121. aspersion (n.) a curse, expression of ill-will

   The rival teams constantly cast aspersions on each others’ athletic prowess.

   122. aspire (v.) to long for or to aim toward

   The adolescent writer aspires to write and publish the great American novel someday.

   123. assail (v.) to attack

   At dusk of the evening, the bloody battle will begin, and our unwary foes will be assailed  without mercy.

   124. assess (v.) to evaluate

   Trying to assess the work of a professional is a task best left to the experienced.

   125. assiduous (adj.) hard-working, diligent

   The senior students labored assiduously to finish their projects before the deadline.

   126. assuage (v.) to ease, pacify

   The angry beast would in no wise relent in its attack, for its rage had not been assuaged  by the meager offerings.

   127. astute (adj.) very clever, crafty

   My most astute pupil wrote an absolutely splendid explanation that logically addressed 99% of the questions posed by the panel.

   128. asylum a. (n.) a place of refuge, a sanctuary; b. (n.) institution for the insane.

   a. The deep woods are my personal asylum when silliness surrounds me and threatens to stay.

   b. All rapists and most murderers should be placed in asylums then diagnosed and cured.

   129. atone (v.) to repent, make amends

   To atone  for his crimes, sad and regretful jaywalker volunteered for community service.

   130. atrophy (v.) to wither away, decay

   Any body parts deprived of blood for an extended period will surely atrophy and die.

   131. attain (v.) to achieve, arrive at

   The runners work fifty hours a week to attain their competitive level of fitness.

   132. attribute a. (v.) to credit, assign; b. (n.) a facet or trait

   a.) He attributes the bulk of his success to his wife’s constant pep talks.

   b.) One attribute that all toddlers have is an insatiable curiosity about everything.

   133. atypical (adj.) not typical, unusual

   Using sewing scissors to cut the lawn is the most atypical thing I’ve ever seen.

   134. audacious (adj.) excessively bold

   An audacious freshman actually challenged the upperclassmen to a match of wits.

   135. audible (adj.) able to be heard

   The cries from the dungeon were barely audible; thus, they were heard only during the hush of the night.

   136. augment (v.) to add to, expand

   To augment his root word vocabulary, Kevin bought a Greek and Latin compendium of basic root meanings

   137. auspicious (adj.) favorable, indicative of good things

   The most auspicious time is just before dawn; so, that’s when we should try again.

   138. austere (adj.) very bare, bleak

   The Saharan Desert is one of the most austere habitats on the planet.

   139. avarice (n.) excessive greed

   Avarice has been the downfall of many an enterprising gentleman. Take note and hide yourself.

   140. avenge (v.) to seek revenge

   Taking justice into your own hands is probably a notion fed by the impulse to avenge, not the impulse to do the right thing.

   141. aversion (n.) a particular dislike for something

   Being a product of the South, I have a natural aversion to anything that’s anti-sports!

                                                                         B --

   142. balk (v.) to stop, block abruptly

   Because I took his comment the wrong way, I just balked at everything else he said.

   143. ballad (n.) a love song

   I wrote a ballad for the love of my life; however, the love of my life wrote one for someone else!

   144. banal (adj.) dull, commonplace

   The presentations lacked originality and spark; thus, they all struck me as banal.

   145. bane (n.) a burden

   That moron seated behind me has been the absolute bane of my existence since grade school.

   146. bard (n.) a poet, or a singer

   William Shakespeare is often hailed the greatest bard of all time.

   147. bashful (adj.) shy, excessively timid

   Jerry was so bashful, he didn’t even answer the beautiful girl when she asked him to go to the prom with her!

   148. battery a. (n.) a device that supplies power; b. (n.) assault, beating

   a.) Battery powered cars will be all the rage somewhere in the future.

   b.) Assault and battery is a felony, not just a misdemeanor.

   149. beguile (v.) to trick, deceive

   The Devil beguiled Eve and she ate of the forbidden fruit.

   150. behemoth (n.) large creature; something of tremendous power or size

   The behemoths were rolled into place using two tractors and an earthmover.

   151. benevolent (adj.) marked by goodness or doing good

   All public servants should be commended for their benevolent acts for the community.

   152. benign (adj.) favorable, not threatening, mild

   When the doctor said, “It’s benign, Mr. Jackson,” I almost cried aloud.

   153. bequeath (v.) to pass on in a will, give or donate legally

   Matthew’s father bequeathed all of his incredible wealth to him and his little brother.

   154. berate (v.) to scold vehemently

   The aggravated policeman berated the ill-tempered driver for using profane language in front of a youngster..

   155. bereft (adj.) devoid of, without

   An entire village was bereft of food and medical supplies after the tsunami.

   156. beseech (v.) to beg, plead, implore

   The medical community spoke with one voice as it beseeched the country to stop smoking.

   157. bias (n.) a tendency, inclination, prejudice

   The judge’s bias against drunk drivers caused him to step aside and allow one of his colleagues to preside in the matter.

   158. bilk (v.) cheat, defraud

   The salesman bilked several of his prospects out of thousands of dollars in down payments.

   159. blandish (v.) to coax by using flattery

   Blandishing under-aged teens into taking an alcoholic drink is illegal in most states, but should be illegal in all.

   160. blemish (n.) an imperfection, flaw

   Because of a single blemish on my driving record, my rates are being doubled.

   161. blight a. (n.) a plague, disease; b. (n.) a scar or mark of discoloration

   a.) The potato blight destroyed the livelihood of many families in Ireland.

   b.) His attitude was an ugly blight upon his daughter’s wedding day.

   162. boisterous (adj.) loud and full of energy

   The cheerleaders were incredibly boisterous during the pep rally last night.

   163. bombastic (adj.) excessively confident, pompous

   The entertainer’s bombastic comments caused the audience to boo and hiss.

   164. boon (n.) a gift or blessing

   The bad weather has erased the boon in business that the income tax refunds fueled.

   165. bourgeois (n.) an upper middle-class person, a successful capitalist

   The bourgeois clients of Hampton Province would not wear off-the-rack items.

   166. brazen (adj.) excessively bold, brash

   The invaders brazen attack took the fort by surprise; no one survived.

   167. brusque (adj.) short, abrupt, dismissive

   The bushman’s brusque manners offended the hostess to no end.

   168. buffet a. (v.) to strike with force; b. (n.) arrangement of food on a table

   a.) The soldiers buffeted the prisoners, desperate for information.

   b.) I love to eat buffet style; the all-you-can-eat expectation suits me to a tee.

   169. burnish (v.) to polish, shine

   Good swordsmen burnish their blades after every bloody use.

   170. buttress a. (v.) to support, hold up; b. (n.) something that offers support

   a.) The column was reinforced so that it could buttress the roof of the building.

   b.) A solid granite buttress supports the entire structure with no help needed.

                                                                         C --

   171. cacophony (n.) tremendous noise, disharmonious sound

   The amateur orchestra created a deafening cacophony during their warm-ups.

   172. cadence (n.) a rhythm, progression of sound

   The throbbing cadence that the soldiers marched made them seem even more fierce.

   173. cajole (v.) to urge, coax

   Frank tried to cajole his buddy to skip school with him on his birthday.

   174. calamity (n.) an event with disastrous consequences

   Hurricane Francis created a calamity that is still impacting thousands and thousands.

   175. calibrate (v.) to set, standardize

   I attempted to calibrate my car’s computer timing system, but failed.

   176. callous (adj.) harsh, cold, unfeeling

   Callous treatment of prisoners is not something that our government condones.

   177. calumny (n.) an attempt to spoil someone else’s reputation by spreading lies

   Calumny is a close-to-perfect synonym for the word of slander.

   178. camaraderie (n.) brotherhood, partnership, jovial unity

   Camaraderie among teammates is usually a result of joint suffering and survival.

   179. candor (n.) honesty, frankness

   Brenda’s candor was a shock to all who heard her speak so freely of theretofore never broached subjects.

   180. canny (adj.) shrewd, careful

   The canny spy gathered all the proof he needed without ever being detected.

   181. canvas a. (n.) a piece of cloth for an artist to paint; b. (v.) to cover, inspect

   a.) With the canvas in place, the artistic prodigy began to create a wonder.

   b.) We canvassed the area, looking for anyone who would buy five boxes of cookies.

   182. capacious (adj.) very spacious

   The work room has finally been expanded; it’s now capacious enough for our guests.

   183. capitulate (v.) to surrender

   The enemy country capitulated in full after the second bomb fell on another city.

   184. capricious (adj.) subject to whim, fickle

   Impatient people often make capricious decisions under the least pressure.

   185. captivate (v.) to get the attention of, hold

   The Fourth of July display captivated the children with its colorful bursts.

   186. carouse (v.) to party, celebrate

   The Navy seamen caroused all night after arriving at their first port of call.

   187. carp (v.) to annoy, pester

   The man finally chastised his daughter after enduring her carping for hours.

   188. catalog a. (v.) to list, enter onto a list; b. (n.) a list or collection

   a.) The prosecutor cataloged the victim’s injuries then made an impassioned plea to the members of the jury.

   b.) Many people shop in on-line catalogs these days just to save gas money.

   189. catalyze (v.) to charge, inspire

   The king’s speech catalyzed his warriors and prepared them to face a deadly foe.

   190. caucus (n.) a meeting usually held by people working toward the same goal

   The union representatives are having a caucus with the team owners about retirement compensation for players.

   191. caustic (adj.) bitter, biting, acidic

   The defendant’s caustic threats to the jury really sealed his fate.

   192. cavort (v.) to leap about, behave boisterously

   The couple, after several glasses of wedding cheer, cavorted about like silly children.

   193. censure a. (n.) harsh criticism; b. (v.) to rebuke formally

   a.) The censure from the officer really shook the unlicensed teen driver.

   b.) The teacher received a sharp censure for threatening to strike one of his students.

   194. cerebral (adj.) related to the intellect

   The library’s shelves are stacked with cerebral selections on philosophy, religion, etc.

   195. chaos (n.) absolute disorder

   When the announcement was made, utter chaos broke out in the hallways.

   196. chastise (v.) to criticize severely

   After a severe chastisement by her parents Sue decided to never lie to anyone else ever again.

   197. cherish (v.) to feel or show deep affection toward something

   I cherish those things that are dear to me and that will never leave me.

   198. chide (v.) to voice disapproval

   Candice chided her twins for keeping their room is such disarray.

   199. choreography (n.) the arrangement of dances

   The choreography was superb; only the dancers with sublime skill were allowed to perform it.

   200. chronicle a. (n.) a written history; b. (v.) to write a detailed history

   a.) The chronicle of the Vietnam War is available with graphic footage.

   b.) Attempting to chronicle an average month in his classroom is a daunting chore.

   201. chronological (adj.) arranged in order of time

   Drawing timelines is the best way to place events in chronological order.

   202. circuitous (adj.) roundabout

   The politician gave very confusing and circuitous answers to every question.

   203. circumlocution (n.) indirect and wordy language

   The debate team used circumlocution as a strategy to address the illogical aspects of their argument.

   204. circumscribed (adj.) marked off, bounded

   The circumscribed area of the football field was drawn with stripes and yardage numbers.

   205. circumspect (adj.) cautious; aware of what’s around you

   Circumspect people always look at situations from all directions.

   206. circumvent (v.) to go around an established route or authority

   To circumvent the teacher’s no-talk rule, the students pretended to clear their throats constantly.

   207. clairvoyant (adj.) able to perceive things that normal people cannot

   My mother’s incredible ability to see my true intentions was nothing short of clairvoyant.

   208. clamor a. (n.) loud noise; b. (v.)to loudly insist

   a.) Every night our upstairs neighbors made such a clamor that the police would have to be called.

   b.) Jesse has been clamoring for a new car all summer long.

   209. clandestine (adj.) secret

   A clandestine rendezvous was planned by the two secret agents.

   210. cleave a. (v.) to divide into parts; b. (v.) to stick together firmly

   a.) Mr. Jones cleaved the wood blocks into kindling in no time at all.

   b.) Every married couple must learn to cleave to one another through thick and thin.

   211. clemency (n.) mercy

   After his fifth speeding ticket in a year, Mark could only beg the judge for clemency.

   212. clergy (n.) members of Christian holy orders

   Some members of the clergy pray in the wee hours of the morning while others sleep.

   213. cloying (adj.) sickeningly sweet

   Excessive praise of anyone can become cloying, making the recipient nauseous.

   214. coagulate (v.) to thicken, clot

   The blood finally began to coagulate, after a full hour of intense preesure.

   215. coalesce (v.) to fuse into a whole

   After several months of therapy, the images in Tom's vision began to coalesce once again on his conscious mind.

   216. cobbler (n.) a person who makes or repairs shoes

   Most cobblers make shoes out of the finest materials possible.

   217. coerce (v.) to make somebody do something by force or threat

   The defense team charged the prosecutors with trying to coerce witnesses into lying.

   218. cogent (adj.) intellectually convincing

   Kimberly’s position was expressed so cogently, I was forced to agree with her.

   219. cognizant (adj.) aware, mindful

   Being fully cognizant of all the rules, the misguided teen still slipped out of his room after midnight.

   220. coherent (adj.) logically consistent, intelligible

   The victim was hardly coherent; thus, the officers had to delay their questioning.

   221. collateral a. (adj.) secondary ; b. (n.) security for a debt

   a.) During every military conflict, wise leaders always attempt to minimize the collateral damage.

   b.) Jack had to leave the title to his car collateral for the $2500 loan.

   222. colloquial (adj.) characteristic of informal conversation

   I ain't got none is a colloquial expression that means I don't have any.

   223. collusion (n.) secret agreement, conspiracy

   Some gamblers work in collusion to cheat naive players out of their hard earned cash.

   224. colossus (n.) a gigantic statue or thing

   In ancient Corinth a colossus of Athena stood tall, testifying of a time long ago.

   225. combustion (n.) the act or process of burning

   Combustion engines must have fuel that will ignite and burn with the least spark.

   226. commendation (n.) a notice of approval or recognition

   Jason received commendations from his squad leader for an uncommon act of bravery.

   227. commensurate (adj.) corresponding in size or amount

   Usually starting salaries are commensurate with a person's level of experience.

   228. commodious (adj.) roomy

   The hotel rooms at the Horizon were both commodious and lavishly decorated.

   229. compelling (adj.) forceful, demanding attention

   His description of that lush vale was so compelling, I had to see it, at least once.

   230. compensate (v.) to make an appropriate payment for something

   Because they were to be compensated every two weeks for their labor, the Bordon's arranged their financial affairs accordingly.

   231. complacency (n.) self-satisfied ignorance of danger

   Due to his chronic complacency, Aaron just sat there, knowing his test was coming, and prepared not at all.

   232. complement (v.) to complete, make perfect or whole

   That picturesque cover page really complements the contents of your book, Henry.

   233. compliant (adj.) ready to adapt oneself to another’s wishes

   New employees feel this overwhelming need to be compliant with every request made of them, even if it's nonsensical.

   234. complicit (adj.) being an accomplice in a wrongful act

   By keeping the theft secret, Madison became complicit in it, and was thus charged.

   235. compliment (n.) an expression of esteem or approval

   I always compliment young people when they put forth good effort, despite the outcome.

   236. compound a. (v.) to combine parts ; b. (n.) a combination of different parts c. (n.) a walled area containing a group of buildings

   a.) The protestors compounded their offense by hurling stones at the police.

   b.) Trying to teach compound sentences to middle school students can be a big chore.

   237. comprehensive (adj.) including everything

   My accountant did a comprehensive assessment of my finances and found that my spending had to be curtailed.

   238. compress (v.) to apply pressure, squeeze together.

   The nurse compressed the area of the wound, trying to stop the bleeding.

   239. compunction (n.) distress caused by feeling guilty

   Kerry felt great compunction for the insensitivity he showed to his young employee.

   240. concede (v.) to accept as valid

   Benjamin had to ultimately concede that the new rules were indeed necessary.

   241. conciliatory (adj.) friendly, agreeable

   Buying flowers for his angry bride was a wise and conciliatory gesture on Paul's part.

   242. concise (adj.) brief and direct in expression

   Rules should be pronounced in concise statements of protocol, with nothing left to assume.

   243. concoct (v.) to fabricate, make up

   She concocted the most vile potion imaginable to prank her bratty little brother.

   244. concomitant (adj.) accompanying in a subordinate fashion

   Jealousy, with its concomitant ill will, will never have a proper place in a true friendship.

   245. concord (n.) harmonious agreement

   After numerous sessions with the counselor, the embattled couple finally enjoyed the concord that wedded bliss can bring.

   246. condolence (n.) an expression of sympathy in sorrow

   Brad offered his condolences to his best friend on the loss of his great-grandmother.

   247. condone (v.) to pardon, deliberately overlook

   Fred felt so guilty for condoning his buddy's mistreatment of his wife.

   248. conduit (n.) a pipe or channel through which something passes

   The water flowed through the conduit into the nearby canal.

   249. confection (n.) a sweet, fancy food

   "Confections are my downfall," complained the struggling dieter.

   250. confidant (n.) a person entrusted with secrets

   A spouse should be a person's best and dearest confidant, knowing and sharing in their deepest secrets.

   251. conflagration (n.) great fire

   The great conflagration consumed the entire city of San Francisco in 1850.

   252. confluence (n.) a gathering together

   A confluence of all three rivers met to form the incredible ocean of water that you see.

   253. conformist (n.) one who behaves the same as others

   Because of their conformist mentality, the small country chose not to go to war with the invaders.

   254. confound (v.) to frustrate, confuse

   Jack the Ripper confounded the police with his here-today, gone-today antics.

   255. congeal (v.) to thicken into a solid

   The sauce had congealed into a thick paste, before it could be used as a topping.

   256. congenial (adj.) pleasantly agreeable

   His congenial smile bespoke his kind heart, so everyone loved him.

   257. congregation (n.) a gathering of people, especially for religious services

   The pastor told his congregation to read I Corinthians chapter 13 for that week's bible study.

   258. congruity (n.) the quality of being in agreement

   The talks produced a perfect congruity of opinions among the diplomats.

   259. connive (v.) to plot, scheme

   Josephine connived her way into the heart of the boss, intent on wielding influence.

   260. consecrate (v.) to dedicate something to a holy purpose

   Albert chose to consecrated his great abilities to the cause of his Lord.

   261. consensus (n.) an agreement of opinion

   The committee was able to reach a consensus on what the spending priorities should be.

   262. consign (v.) to give something over to another’s care

   Billy consigned all of his baseball cards to the Sports Authority Trading Center.

   263. consolation (n.) an act of comforting

   Alton’s attempt at consolation toward his bereaved friend was taken as an act of supreme brotherhood.

   264. consonant (adj.) in harmony

   The musicians' tunes were consonant and extraordinarily beautiful.

   265. constituent (n.) an essential part

   The most important constituents of her homemade brew was collard juice and green onions.

   266. constrain (v.)to forcibly restrict

   I'm constrained by my belief in peace to simply walk away from an opportunity to battle.

   267. construe (v.) to interpret

   Paul attempted to construe the letter from John as an attempt to sway the judgment of the council.

   268. consummate (v.) to complete a deal or ceremony

   The happy couple planned to consummate their relationship on the Isle of Manville Rey.

   269. consumption (n.) the act of consuming

   Consumption of any intoxicating beverages is permitted only after duty hours.

   270. contemporaneous (adj.) existing during the same time

   The Age of Discovery and The Age of Reason existed contemporaneously, each supporting the other.

   271. contentious (adj.) having a tendency to quarrel or dispute

   Greg’s contentious personality made him prone to get into fights with anyone and everyone.

   272. contravene (v.) to contradict, oppose, violate

   Candice contravened her husband's instructions to the children, thus confusing them.

   273. contrite (adj.) penitent, eager to be forgiven

   Bobby’s contrite heart caused him to finally see the damage he'd caused to his teammates.

   274. contusion (n.) bruise, injury

   Due to his motorcycle accident, Charles had contusions all over his body.

   275. conundrum (n.) puzzle, problem

   The thunderstorm and the deadline in tandem created a conundrum for the hikers.

   276. convene (v.) to call together

   The council convened to discuss all of the requests for increased funding.

   277. convention a. (n.) an assembly of people; b. (n.) a rule, custom

   a.) The convention will be in town this weekend, taking up all of the hotel space.

   b.) The washing of feet is a convention of ancient Eastern culture.

   278. convivial (adj.) characterized by feasting, drinking, merriment

   The convivial atmosphere at the family reunion was so great that even the food had a festive taste.

   279. convoluted (adj.) intricate, complicated

   The witness's story was so convoluted that no one believed it, not even those who needed his testimony.

   280. copious (adj.) profuse, abundant

   Copious amounts of fresh fruits and vegetables were loaded aboard the transfer trucks bound for Alabama.

   281. cordial (adj.) warm, affectionate

   Her cordial invitation was received eagerly, and it was responded to the same.

   282. coronation (n.) the act of crowning

   The queen’s coronation ball was the hardest ticket in town.

   283. corpulence (adj.)extreme fatness

   Because the chefs in our group were so skilled, corpulence became a real concern.

   284. corroborate (v.) to support with evidence

   Several witnesses corroborated his story; so the detective released him.

   285. corrosive (adj.) having the tendency to erode or eat away

   Acid and metals seldom go together because of the corrosive character of the former.

   286. cosmopolitan (adj.) sophisticated, worldly

   The lady I met at the banquet was a bit cosmopolitan for a country boy like me.

   287. counteract (v.) to neutralize, make ineffective

   Anti-venom was given to the snakebite victim to counteract the rattler’s poison.

   288. coup a. (n.) a brilliant, unexpected act ; b. (n.) the overthrow of a government and assumption of authority

   a.) Carlos, our local chess master, performed a coup that trapped his opponent's king in twelve moves.

   b.) The rebel’s coup was entirely successful; the dictator is out of power this very night.

   289. covert (adj.) secretly engaged in

   The CIA's covert operations in the Middle East are as invisible as clean air.

   290. credulity (n.) readiness to believe

   Ted's credulity made him and his all-too naive cousin really easy victims

   291. crescendo (n.) a steady increase in intensity or volume

   The crescendo of the bass drum started to sound like the heartbeat of an angry giant.

   292. criteria (n.) standards by which something is judged

   Seldom do entering freshman meet the criteria set for leadership on the council.

   293. culmination (n.) the climax toward which something progresses

   The culmination of all our efforts, we hope, will be the installing of a person we can all respect and admire.

   294. culpable (adj.) deserving blame

   The driver was found to be just as culpable as the shooter; thus, they both will be locked up for quite some time.

   295. cultivate (v.) to nurture, improve, refine

   A true politician learns early on to cultivate many friendships and to do many favors.

   296. cumulative (adj.) increasing, building upon itself

   The cumulative effect of days upon days of heavy rains was a river that raged beyond its borders.

   297. cunning (adj.) sly, clever at being deceitful

   Every cat burglar must be as cunning and as quiet as his name suggests.

   298. cupidity (n.) greed, strong desire

   His cupidity made him enter the lotto, using every cent of his grocery money.

   299. cursory (adj.) brief, to the point of being superficial and inadequate

   Giving cursory attention to important matters will, at some point, bring problems.

   300. curt (adj.) abruptly and rudely short

   Edgar's curt reply to Sharon's question made me believe there was trouble in paradise.

   301. curtail (v.) to lessen, reduce

   Since breaking his leg at the tournament, Bill has had to curtail his riding classes.

                                                                         D --

   302. daunting (adj.) intimidating, causing one to lose courage

   After a month, Kevin found cutting his grass and his sick neighbor's a daunting task.

   303. dearth (n.) a lack, scarcity

   Because of the dearth of arable land in the valley, mostly farmers chose to relocate.

   304. debacle (n.) a disastrous failure, disruption

   After his latest debacle, wonder boy has taken a much less conspicuous posture.

   305. debase (v.) to lower the quality or esteem of something

   To bolster his profits, the Cookie King chose to debase the quality of his ingredients, thereby lowering his costs.

   306. debauch (v.) to corrupt by means of sensual pleasures

   Massages and hot tubs are key ingredients necessary to debauch most weekends.

   307. debunk (v.) to expose the falseness of something

   To debunk the theory of evolution, some creationists point to the Law of Biogenesis.

   308. decorous (adj.) socially proper, appropriate

   The decorous manners of the guests made hosting the evening a task most pleasant.

   309. decry (v.) to criticize openly in an effort to devalue

   In his attempt to decry the value of the portrait, the investor pointed to its fringes.

   310. deface (v.) to ruin or injure something’s appearance

   The boys threw eggs and sprayed shaving cream to deface their teacher's car.

   311. defamatory (adj.) harmful toward another’s reputation

   The defamatory remarks made by the officer were deemed slanderous by all who heard.

   312. defer (v.) to postpone something; to yield to another’s wisdom

   Due to a bout with strep throat, the opera singer chose to defer all of his engagements.

   313. deferential (adj.) showing respect for another’s authority

   The captain chose to be differential, in light of the general's unexpected presence.

   314. defile (v.) to make unclean, impure

   She defiled herself when she accepted a dare to undress in a public square.

   315. deft (adj.) skillful, capable

   Milton's deft attempt at humor was a sensational surprise; no one knew about his wit.

   316. defunct (adj.) no longer used or existing

   The divorced man spoke of his defunct marriage with the most baleful sigh.

   317. delegate (v.) to hand over responsibility for something

   The principal delegated the task of finding a new teacher to the department chairman.

   318. deleterious (adj.) harmful

   The deleterious effects of going without food for many days can be seen many years after the fact.

   319. deliberate (adj.) intentional, reflecting careful consideration

   Though Martha made a deliberate attempt to calm the situation, tempers yet burned.

   320. delineate (v.) to describe, outline, shed light on

   Shaunt´e clearly delineated her position on the matter, almost convincing her opponent.

   321. demagogue (n.) a leader who appeals to a people’s prejudices

   The demagogue addressed the people with many tales of gloom and doom.

   322. demarcation (n.) the marking of boundaries or categories

   Lying is one moral demarcation that I will not cross.

   323. demean (v.) to lower the status or stature of something

   The coach refused to demean his players by blaming them for the lost.

   324. demure (adj.) quiet, modest, reserved

   She remained demure, even in the face of monumental temptations to join the fun.

   325. denigrate (v.) to belittle, diminish the opinion of

   The essay denigrated all of the people who'd gone ahead of the current group.

   326. denounce (v.) to criticize publicly

   The executive denounced all the criticism of his company, calling it unfounded.

   327. deplore (v.) to feel or express sorrow, disapproval

   Nelson deplored the terrible working conditions at his old job.

   328. depravity (n.) wickedness

   The assassin's depravity made him willing to slay even the faces of the innocent.

   329. deprecate (v.) to belittle, depreciate

   Self-deprecating humor is the hallmark of the self assured.

   330. derelict (adj.) abandoned, run-down

   The derelict ship just drifted in the harbor, waiting to be boarded by the curious.

   331. deride (v.) to laugh at mockingly, scorn

   The 6th graders proved to be bullies, and derided the 3rd and 4th graders.

   332. derivative (adj.) taken directly from a source, unoriginal

   "His scowling countenance is a derivative of his paternal lineage," claimed his mom.

   333. desecrate (v.) to violate the sacredness of a thing or place

   The pagan's desecrated the temple by challenging the priests to duals and fist fights.

   334. desiccated (adj.) dried up, dehydrated

   The desiccated remains of the Egyptian mummies can still strike amazement into the hearts of Westerners.

   335. desolate (adj.) deserted, dreary, lifeless

   The desert, especially at night, seems to be the most desolate place on earth.

   336. despondent (adj.) feeling depressed, discouraged, hopeless

   Geraldine became completely despondent when the news of the accident came.

   337. despot (n.) one who has total power and rules brutally

   The despot used threats of death and torture to control his citizenry.

   338. destitute (adj.) impoverished, utterly lacking

   The tornados destroyed many homes and left every family destitute and poor.

   339. deter (v.) to discourage, prevent from doing

   Nothing can deter an attacking lion once its victim has been chosen.

   340. devious (adj.) not straightforward, deceitful

   Wanting to avoid punishment, the devious teen blamed the broken cup on his sister.

   341. dialect (n.) a variation of a language

   The southerners were given away, as their dialect announced they weren't from Maine.

   342. diaphanous (adj.) light, airy, transparent

   Diaphanous garbs in summer can help anyone get an authentic all-over tan.

   343. didactic a. (adj.) intended to instruct; b. (adj.) overly moralistic

   a.) She became very didactic, once the students revealed their many needs.

   b.) Few people appreciated didactic stories that preach and don't also entertain.

   344. diffident (adj.) shy, quiet, modest

   The diffident young man did not speak during introductions, for his constant fear of seeming too audacious.

   345. diffuse a. (v.) to scatter, thin out, break up; b. (adj.) not concentrated, scattered or disorganized

   a.) Clod diffused the tension in the house by telling one of his creative anecdotes.

   b.) Martha tried desperately to explain her diffuse thought process, but to no avail.

   346. dilatory (adj.) tending to delay, causing delay

   Wise parents learn dilatory tactics to avoid giving unrehearsed answers to teens.

   347. diligent (adj.) showing care in doing one’s work

   The diligent researcher checked and re-checked the data, ensuring it was valid.

   348. diminutive (adj.) small or miniature

   The bullies, big and ill-tempered, picked on the diminutive children all the time.

   349. dirge (n.) a mournful song, especially for a funeral

   The singer sang a dirge as the casket was carried slowly to its place of rest.

   350. disaffected (adj.) rebellious, resentful of authority

   The disaffected soldier ignored his orders, slipped into the night, and left his company to battle without him.

   351. disavow (v.) to deny knowledge of or responsibility for

   When spies are caught, their respective governments will disavow any knowledge of their actions.

   352. discern (v.) to perceive, detect

   It is extremely difficult to discern subtle messages when they are contained in foreign tongues.

   353. disclose (v.) to reveal, make public

   The CEO was required to disclose all documents related to their latest European purchase.

   354. discomfit (v.) to thwart, baffle

   The interrogators attempted to discomfit their prisoners so that information could be gained.

   355. discordant (adj.) not agreeing, not in harmony with

   When the beginning band started to play, the discordant sounds flooded the room like a noisy cloud.

   356. discrepancy (n.) difference, failure of things to correspond

   The discrepancy in the cost figures caused the principals to fear the upcoming audit.

   357. discretion (n.) the quality of being reserved in speech or action; good judgment

   I will leave it to your discretion as to whether or not to invite the new girl; she seems a bit suspect.

   358. discursive (adj.) rambling, lacking order

   Bob's speech became discursive after the hecklers started to yell their disapproval.

   359. disdain a. (v.) to scorn, hold in low esteem; b. (n.) scorn, low esteem

   a.) Intolerant people tend to disdain all those who disagree with them.

   b.) I hold all irresponsible abuses of powers in great disdain.

   360. disgruntled (adj.) upset, not content

   Jackie became totally disgruntled when her fiancé forgot the anniversary of their first date.

   361. disheartened (adj.) feeling a loss of spirit or morale

   The team became sorely disheartened when the other team scored five runs in a row.

   362. disparage (v.) to criticize or speak ill of

   Usually, insecure people try to disparage the efforts of others.

   363. disparate (adj.) sharply differing, containing sharply contrasting elements

   Because of the presence of disparate elements, it was difficult to identify the substance with certainty.

   364. dispatch (v.) to send off to accomplish a duty

   The commander dispatched a lone soldier to carry the message of surrender to their opponents.

   365. dispel (v.) to drive away, scatter

   It's hard to dispel the notions that become a part of you in childhood.

   366. disperse (v.) to scatter, cause to scatter

   It was our mission to disperse the rowdy crowd before violence could escalate.

   367. disrepute (n.) a state of being held in low regard

   Bad behavior, even if it’s just intermittent, will cause one to fall into disrepute.

   368. dissemble (v.) to conceal, fake

   The lying witness tried to dissemble the facts; however, the clever attorney trapped him easily.

   369. disseminate (v.) to spread widely

   The teacher gave the papers to the student to disseminate to her classmates.

   370. dissent a. (v.) to disagree; b. (n.) the act of disagreeing

   a.) I must dissent, gentlemen; this simply cannot be.

   b.) After the dissent was registered, everyone knew it was going to be a long night.

   371. dissipate a. (v.) to disappear, cause to disappear; b. (v.) to waste

   a.) The sun finally came out, and the fog dissipated like smoke.

   b.) Thanks to a card game, Joe's paycheck was dissipated in less than an hour.

   372. dissonance (n.) lack of harmony or consistency

   There was a remarkable dissonance between what Jasper said and what Jasper did.

   373. dissuade (v.) to persuade someone not to do something

   Gloria tried to dissuade him from going out in such bad weather; but, he went anyway.

   374. distend (v.) to swell out

   The malnourished children's stomachs begin to distend when their hunger approaches starvation.

   375. dither (v.) to be indecisive

   The many options before him caused him to dither on his choices.

   376. divine (adj.) godly, exceedingly wonderful

   Our plight was of such that only divine intervention was going to make a difference.

   377. divisive (adj.) causing dissent, discord

   Theo was disciplined because his comments were deemed divisive by his employers.

   378. divulge (v.) to reveal something secret

   Under pressure, the frightened captive started to divulge all he knew.

   379. docile (adj.) easily taught or trained

   Some sharks are docile; others are very aggressive.

   380. dogmatic (adj.) aggressively and arrogantly sure about unproved principles

   Because of his personal connections with the group, he was very dogmatic about their innocence.

   381. dormant (adj.) asleep or temporarily inactive

   The medication caused the virus to become dormant; thus, it could no longer be transmitted to others.

   382. dour (adj.) stern, joyless

   The counselor was a dour fellow indeed, finding nothing whatsoever to laugh about or to even smile about.

   383. dubious (adj.) doubtful, of uncertain quality

   I heard his story; however, I remain somewhat dubious as to its truth.

   384. duplicity (n.) crafty dishonesty

   Super spies must deal in duplicity in all of their contacts, lest they be found out and dealt with.

   385. duress (n.) hardship, threat

   The lawyer was able to convince the jury that his client only committed the offense because of the extreme duress he was under – thanks to the
   victim.

   386. dynamic (adj.) actively changing; powerful

   Learning, according to educators, is a dynamic process that must be seen and understood in that light.

                                                                         E --

   387. ebullient (adj.) extremely lively, enthusiastic

   Because Ken was so ebullient in his manner, his party turned out to be the most fun of them all.

   388. eclectic (adj.) consisting of a diverse variety of elements

   The freshmen this year are so eclectic that they constantly find fascination with every new subject, and consequently change their majors to
   match.

   389. ecstatic (adj.) intensely and overpoweringly happy

   I was ecstatic when the news came about the graduation of my eldest son, Dr. Raymond L. Johnson!

   390. edict (n.) an order, decree

   When the king's edict was read, the malcontents in his kingdom began to slowly disappear until not one was left.

   391. efface (v.) to wipe out, obliterate, rub away

   Because the letter was offensive to all who read it, every word of it was effaced.

   392. effervescent (adj.) bubbly, lively

   The effervescent spirit of the cheerleaders was truly infectious; everyone was screaming and shouting through the whole game.

   393. efficacious (adj.) effective

   The compound proved to be quite efficacious; every patient recovered almost instantly.

   394. effrontery (n.) impudence, nerve, insolence

   The brash teen had the effrontery to yell back at her parents, when she knew full well that she was in the wrong.

   395. effulgent (adj.) radiant, splendorous

   The monarch's new palace, made of gold and silver, was the most effulgent structure ever constructed.

   396. egregious (adj.) extremely bad

   Tammy's behavior was so egregious that she was thrown off the team that very hour.

   397. elaborate (adj.) complex, detailed, intricate

   Pyramids are designed with very elaborate pathways, designed to trap would-be robbers.

   398. elated (adj.) overjoyed, thrilled

   Marvin was totally elated to find out that his project won first place.

   399. elegy (n.) a speech given in honor of a dead person

   The widow Morgan chose to read her husband's elegy herself, feeling the message was too personal for anyone else to read.

   400. elicit (v.) to bring forth, draw out, evoke

   Pearson's melancholy tale was designed to elicit sympathy from all who heard it.

   401. eloquent (adj.) expressive, articulate, moving

   As the young woman spoke, her words were so eloquent many listeners became teary- eyed.

   402. elucidate (v.) to clarify, explain

   Professor Jazz decided to elucidate further when he noted the blank expressions on his students' faces.

   403. elude (v.) to evade, escape
   To elude capture, the clever criminals waded into the river and floated with the logs.
   404. emaciated (adj.) very thin, enfeebled looking

   The gaunt guitar player is the perfect example of an emaciated man.

   405. embellish a. (v.) to decorate, adorn; b. (v.) to add details to, enhance

   a.) The last chore on Christmas Eve is to embellish the spruce pines with ribbons and bows.

   b.) The talented speaker embellished his argument with quaint expressions that suggested he was just a regular guy running for office.

   406. embezzle (v.) to steal money by falsifying records

   The crooked bank executive was sentenced to 20 years in prison for embezzling millions of dollars.

   407. emend (v.) to correct or revise a written text
   Many times, editors will emend the words of a script to make it have a broader appeal.
   41
   408. eminent a. (adj.) distinguished, prominent, famous; b. (adj.) conspicuous
   a.) The eminent scientist made an earth-shattering announcement at the conference.

   b.) The malformations of Jeff's face stood out eminently when the sunlight struck at an angle.

   409. emollient (adj.) soothing
   "This emollient will make your skin as smooth as a baby's bottom," the manager said.
   410. emote (v.) to express emotion

   Seeing the inspiring scene for the tenth time, everyone began to emote as they'd done the first time.

   411. empathy (n.) sensitivity to another’s feelings as if they were one’s own

   I have great empathy for everyone who has to go through what I've faced.

   412. empirical a. (adj.) based on observation or experience ; b. (adj.) capable of being proved or disproved by experiment

   a.) The scientist gathered empirical data to prove that his predictions weren't baseless.

   b.) Every word Einstein spoke was considered empirical; for the experimental proof was on the table.

   413. emulate (v.) to imitate

   Teens constantly emulate their idols, singing and dancing as much like them as their modest abilities will allow.

   414. enamor (v.) to fill with love, to fascinate (usually used with “of” or “with”)

   The husband-hunting women sought to enamor the eligible bachelors with their smiles and seductive movement.

   415. encore (n.) a repeat performance at the audiences' insistence.

   “Encore! Encore!” the crazed fans screamed, over and over again.

   416. encumber (v.) to weigh down, burden

   Trying not to encumber my parents further, I chose not to tell them about my lost job.

   417. enervate (v.) to weaken, exhaust

   The marathoners, languishing in the heat, were completely enervated after the tenth mile.

   418. enfranchise (v.) to grant the vote to

   The Fifth Amendment enfranchised those who would rather not admit their guilt in a court of law.

   419. engender (v.) to bring about, create, generate

   Trying to engender strife among the groups of voters, the devilish candidate sabotaged one group and blamed it on the other.

   420. enigmatic (adj.) mystifying, cryptic

   The inscriptions of the monolith were so enigmatic, our best linguists couldn't decipher them.

   421. enmity (n.) ill will, hatred, hostility

   The opposing parties felt such enmity for one another, they could not bear so much the mentioning of the other's name.

   422. ennui (n.) boredom, weariness

   I felt such ennui that I colored my bedroom brown and threw all of my flowers out of the window.

   423. entail (v.) to include as a necessary step

   Genuine success entails many elements, the least of which is not solid conviction.

   424. enthrall (v.) to charm, hold spellbound

   Enthralled with her beauty, the young man didn't notice her ill temper.

   425. ephemeral (adj.) short-lived, fleeting

   Physical beauty is ephemeral at best; it lasts only as long as your youth.

   426. epistolary (adj.) relating to or contained in letters

   One of the chief epistolary writings of Paul is the book of Romans.

   427. epitome (n.) a perfect example, embodiment

   The running back for Miami was the epitome of athleticism, being fast, agile, and strong.

   428. equanimity (n.) composure

   Glenn maintained his equanimity, even in the face of terrible accusations against him.

   429. equivocal (adj.) ambiguous, uncertain, undecided

   Politicians usually give equivocal answers to difficult questions.

   430. erudite (adj.) learned

   My physics teacher is such an erudite scholar that she has calculated, in her head, the distance from each planet relative to the Earth.

   431. eschew (v.) to shun, avoid

   Good men must learn to cherish the right things and eschew the wrong.

   432. esoteric (adj.) understood by only a select few

   Even the most gifted students can't fully fathom the esoteric nature of existence itself

   433. espouse (v.) to take up as a cause, support

   Constantly, we should all espouse the virtues of honesty and integrity to our children.

   434. ethereal (adj.) heavenly, exceptionally delicate or refined

   The maiden's elegant attire and other-worldly expression struck everyone as somewhat ethereal.

   435. etymology (n.) the history of words, their origin and development

   From my study of the etymology of terms, I now know that the word “Herculean” derives from the Greek myth of Hercules, the son of Zeus.

   436. euphoric (adj.) elated, uplifted

   Young lovers tend to become euphoric about the object of their desire, not seeing any flaws in them that may be obvious to others.

   437. evanescent (adj.) fleeting, momentary

   All life on this Earth is most evanescent, appearing like a vapor then vanishing away.

   438. evince (v.) to show, reveal

   The lecturer’s endless address evinced his life-long passion for his subject.

   439. exacerbate (v.) to make more violent, intense

   Mrs. Johnston exacerbated her problem by lying about what she'd done.

   440. exalt (v.) to glorify, praise

   Our youth should be taught to exalt important things in life: the elderly, civil conduct, and moral laws.

   441. exasperate (v.) to irritate, irk

   Thomas's constant jabbering started to exasperate all of his classmates, provoking some of them to actually threaten his physical safety.

   442. excavate (v.) to dig out of the ground and remove

   The treasures of Solomon's mines were never excavated; for, they could never be located.

   443. exculpate (v.) to free from guilt or blame, exonerate

   In today's legal environment, one must have a good lawyer if one is to be exculpated  from the least charge.

   444. excursion (n.) a trip or outing

   Our class is going on a brief excursion to the John Prince Park, as a reward for the test scores that were much better than expected.

   445. execrable (adj.) loathsome, detestable

   The criminal's act was utterly execrable, offending even the other hardened inmates.

   446. exhort (v.) to urge, prod, spur

   Parents usually exhort their children to perform their very best in everything, especially academics.

   447. exigent (adj.) urgent, critical

   The situation became instantly exigent when the injured player started to spit blood.

   448. exonerate (v.) to free from guilt or blame, exculpate

   As the false witness finally broke down and started to tell the truth, Jake knew he would ultimately be exonerated.

   449. exorbitant (adj.) excessive

   It's never good to criticize anyone exorbitantly, even if they did something for which they should be ashamed.

   450. expedient (adj.) advisable, advantageous, serving one’s self-interest

   Though I can exempt myself from the chores that the other workers have to do, it wouldn't beexpedient; for, they need to feel that I am one of
   them.

   451. expiate (v.) to make amends for, atone

   In an attempt to expiate my crime, I offered to wash Mrs. Jones's car every week for a year.

   452. expunge (v.) to obliterate, eradicate

   Theodore is attempting to have his teenage record expunged on the grounds that he was only a minor when his misdeeds were done.

   453. expurgate (v.) to remove offensive or incorrect parts, usually of a book

   The editors were required to expurgate the misinformation from the text and print and apology along with the true account.

   454. extant (adj.) existing, not destroyed or lost

   The memoirs of Julie Mayes were proven to be extant, when an old forgotten chest was opened and examined.

   455. extol (v.) to praise, revere

   Coach Val began to extol the virtues of his players, calling them the finest group of young men he'd ever had the pleasure of coaching.

   456. extraneous (adj.) irrelevant, extra, not necessary

   "Remove all extraneous paraphernalia from your desk tops, please," Mr. Goss instructed.

   457. extricate (v.) to disentangle

   After the evidence was carefully examined, it became clear that the accused would be extricated and set free.

   458. exult (v.) to rejoice

   George exulted for hours when he finally landed that six-figure position.

                                                                         F --

   459. fabricate (v.) to make up, invent

   I don't know why Elvin felt the need to fabricate some wild story; the truth would have served just as well.

   460. façade a. (n.) the wall of a building; b. (n.) a deceptive appearance or attitude

   a.) Because the sun strikes the east façade of the building, we get to see it rise every morning.

   b.) Julian's façade fooled all of his associates, except, of course, those who knew the real him.

   461. facile a. (adj.) easy, requiring little effort; b. (adj.) superficial, achieved with minimal thought or care, insincere

   a.) Come on, Johnny, cleaning your room is a facile chore at best.

   b.) The prince's words came across as facile and contrived; thus, his father knew he was lying.

   462. fallacious (adj.) incorrect, misleading

   Captain Ken took the witness's statement as a fallacious bunch of lies designed to get his friend off the hook.

   463. fastidious (adj.) meticulous, demanding, having high and often unattainable standards

   Because the boss is so fastidious, he never gives a satisfactory evaluation of anyone.

   464. fathom a. (v.) to understand, comprehend; b. (n). six feet deep

   a.) It's truly difficult to fully fathom the quantity of water that's on our beautiful Earth.

   b.) Along the west shoreline, the Lake Omari drops to three fathoms.

   465. fatuous (adj.) silly, foolish

   Carl considers himself a serious writer; however, he pens some of the most infantile, fatuous tales I've ever heard.

   466. fecund (adj.) fruitful, fertile

   The exotic prince insisted that all of his would-be brides be both beautiful and fecund.

   467. felicitous a. (adj.) well suited, apt; b. (adj.) delightful, pleasing

   a.) His dark blue suit was very felicitous, complementing the attire of his lovely wife perfectly.

   b.) A warm greeting from a long-time friend is always felicitous and welcome.

   468. feral (adj.) wild, savage

   The feral hogs in the South Eastern United States are creating major ecological problems.

   469. fervent (adj.) ardent, passionate

   Martha's love for Quinton was fervent like the summer sun; there was no cooling it.

   470. fetid (adj.) having a foul odor

   The fetid stench of week-old meat saturated the butcher, and exposed him to all.

   471. fetter (v.) to chain, restrain

   Everyone should ensure that their yard dogs are either fenced or fettered to a tree.

   475. fickle (adj.) shifting in character, inconstant

   Young boy are so fickle, young girls should always be prepared for heartbreak.

   476. fidelity (n.) loyalty, devotion

   The soldier's fidelity to his band was rewarded with a Medal of Distinction.

   477. figurative (adj.) symbolic

   Using figurative language, Alice compared the storm to an angry man wielding burning daggers.

   478. flabbergasted (adj.) astounded

   When Jethro proposed to Elaine, everyone was completely flabbergasted, saying they thought it would never happen.

   479. flaccid (adj.) limp, not firm or strong

   Over cooking noodles makes them flaccid and mushy like mashed potatoes.

   480. flagrant (adj.) offensive, egregious

   The referee hit the player with a flagrant foul for going to the head with his elbow.

   481. florid (adj.) flowery, ornate

   The mansion was replete with thick columns and florid gardens galore.

   482. flout (v.) to disregard or disobey openly

   Flouting the speed limit, the celebrating teens sped up to 100 mph.

   483. foil (v.) to thwart, frustrate, defeat

   Inspector Goodfellow foiled the thief’s attempt to rob his fifth bank in as many months.

   484. forage (v.) to graze, rummage for food

   Foraging for food, the cows wandered into the neighboring fields.

   485. forbearance (n.) patience, restraint, toleration

   The officer showed great forbearance in listening to the rants of the outraged driver.

   486. forestall (v.) to prevent, thwart, delay

   The governor forestalled the execution in deference to a family member's request.

   487. forlorn (adj.) lonely, abandoned, hopeless

   Jennifer seemed so forlorn, when Aliza, her best friend, moved to Alabama.

   488. forsake (v.) to give up, renounce

   I have decided to forsake all of my vices, especially the tobacco and alcohol.

   489. fortitude (n.) strength, guts

   The fireman demonstrated great fortitude, entering the blazing inferno boldly.

   490. fortuitous (adj.) happening by chance, often lucky or fortunate

   Finding my lost coin was truly a fortuitous event, rivaling finding that lotto ticket.

   491. forum (n.) a medium for lecture or discussion

   Television provides the perfect forum for political candidates to be witnessed thinking on their feet and handling difficult questions.

   492. foster (v.) to stimulate, promote, encourage

   Good manners will always foster positive interactions, even between those who disagree.

   493. fractious (adj.) troublesome or irritable

   The fractious behavior of the fans caused the next game to be cancelled and moved to another venue.

   494. fraught (adj.) (usually used with “with”) filled or accompanied with

   The Forest of Highlands is fraught with dangers -- some seen, others unseen.

   495. frenetic (adj.) frenzied, hectic, frantic

   Trying to maintain such a frenetic pace all day is what causes Jim to simply collapse at night.

   496. frivolous (adj.) of little importance, trifling

   Being preoccupied with frivolous things is a great way to use up your mental energy.

   497. frugal (adj.) thrifty, economical

   Though I'm not quite as frugal as I should be, I'm certainly not a spendthrift.

   498. furtive (adj.) secretive, sly

   Janine saw the furtive smile her boyfriend gave to the waitress; thus, she spent the balance of her evening with a good book and a cup of hot
   cocoa.

                                                                         G --

   499. garish (adj.) gaudy, in bad taste

   Bob must be color blind; because, that's the only thing that could possibly explain the garish decorations in his living room.

   500. garrulous (adj.) talkative, wordy

   The garrulous gals chatted and gabbed all through the movie, to the great irritation of those who also paid to see and hear it.

   501. genial (adj.) friendly, affable

   Genial conduct is one of the sure signals of dignified intelligence.

   502. gluttony (n.) overindulgence in food or drink
   Because of Michael's gluttony, he ended up overeating again, then throwing up all he'd eaten.
   503. goad (v.) to urge, spur, incite to action

   Calvin's friend, Roger, constantly tries to goad him into skipping school with him.

   504. gourmand (n.) someone fond of eating and drinking
   With my diet of chips, cookies, and fries, you'd never confuse me with a real gourmand.
   505. grandiloquence (n.) lofty, pompous language

   Grandiloquence is not a very good substitute for imparting real, thoughtful ideas.

   506. grandiose (adj.) on a magnificent or exaggerated scale

   The computer company is planning a grandiose celebration replete with lasers and every manner of dazzling device.

   507. gratuitous (adj.) uncalled for, unwarranted

   Thanks to the gratuitous gestures of total strangers, we were able to collect all that we needed.

   508. gregarious (adj.) drawn to the company of others, sociable

   The gregarious college kids couldn't be satisfied until they found out where the weekend party would be.

   509. grievous (adj.) injurious, hurtful; serious or grave in nature

   Dr. Green committed a grievous error in his calculations, and announced that the sun was going to explode in 2010.

   510. guile (n.) deceitfulness, cunning, sly behavior

   Professional con men use guile as easily as others use a straw to drink soda.

                                                                         H --

   511. hackneyed (adj.) unoriginal, trite

   After twenty-five straight encores of the new song, though it was beautiful, it became ever so hackneyed.

   512. hallowed (adj.) revered, consecrated

   For lovers of rock and roll, Woodstock is considered hallowed ground.

   513. hapless (adj.) unlucky

   The hapless Red Raiders lost every one of their games this year by an embarrassing margin.

   514. harangue a. (n.) a ranting speech; b. (v.) to give such a speech

   a.) Every student had heard the teacher’s harangue about late homework at least two dozen times.

   b.) Mrs. Shepherd harangued her class a full fifteen minutes about their constant talk.

   515. hardy (adj.) robust, capable of surviving through adverse conditions
   Oaks are very hardy trees, able to survive the harshest winter.

   516. harrowing (adj.) greatly distressing, vexing

   Going through that bank robbery was a harrowing experience that I shall never forget.

   517. haughty (adj.) disdainfully proud

   The haughty rich kids constantly flaunted their brand name garbs and their sports cars.

   518. hedonist (n.) one who believes pleasure should be the primary pursuit of humans

   Because he was such a hedonist, Brandon spent his every waking hour searching for something that felt good, tasted  good, or sounded good.

   519. hegemony (n.) domination over others

   The seniors' hegemony over the underclassmen was a well documented reality on our campus.

   520. heinous (adj.) shockingly wicked, repugnant

   The killings were of such a heinous nature details were withheld from the public.

   521. heterogeneous (adj.) varied, diverse in character

   Because we were placed in heterogeneous groupings, variety was all we knew from day one.

   522. hiatus (n.) a break or gap in duration or continuity

   Benjamin's hiatus lasted so long everyone concluded that he wasn't planning to ever return.

   523. hierarchy (n.) a system with ranked groups

   In the American system of hierarchy and power, civil authorities are placed above military authorities, but not by much.

   524. hypocrisy (n.) pretending to believe what one does not

   It's very difficult for men given to truth to tolerate the hypocrisy that liars engage in daily.

   525. hypothetical (adj.) supposed or assumed true, but unproven

   Many times, the hypothetical enters the realm of the real when understanding matures.

                                                                         I --

   526. iconoclast (n.) one who attacks commonly held beliefs or institutions

   John protests everything that the establishment offers, in true iconoclastic style.

   527. idiosyncratic (adj.) peculiar to one person; highly individualized

   Joshua's idiosyncratic behavior identifies him as the only living descendent of Crazy John Maddox.

   528. idolatrous (adj.) excessively worshipping one object or person

   The undying devotion that modern day kids have for rock stars and athletes is nothing shy of idolatrous.

   529. ignominious (adj.) humiliating, disgracing

   What they did to that baby was the most ignominious act I'd ever heard of or even imagined.

   530. illicit (adj.) forbidden, not permitted

   The pipes and other paraphernalia found in that house were deemed illicit by the investigating officers.

   531. immerse (v.) to absorb, deeply involve, engross

   To master a foreign tongue, one must immerse oneself in it for an extended period of time.

   532. immutable a. (adj.) not changeable; b. (adj.) stoic, not susceptible to suffering

   a.) The laws of physics are immutable and constant, never able to be changed or altered in the least.

   b.) The Eastern philosophies espouse truths that empower one to become immutable.

   533. impeccable (adj.) exemplary, flawless

   His driving record is impeccable, having no marks for moving violations or even parking tickets.

   534. impecunious (adj.) desperately poor

   All of the impecunious children sat on the sides of the streets of their impoverished village, searching for but finding no kindness from the
   passersby.

   535. imperative a. (adj.) necessary, pressing; b. (n.) a rule, command, or order

   a.) It is absolutely imperative that you take the pills according to the directions on the bottle.

   b.) The commander issued an imperative that every soldier must be present and accounted for by eighteen hundred hours.

   536. imperious (adj.) commanding, domineering

   General Thurman had the most imperial presence the tenderfoots had ever encountered; thus, they cowered when he spoke.

   537. impertinent (adj.) rude, insolent

   Most of your comments were dismissed because they were at best impertinent and at worst, unfounded and wrong.

   538. impervious (adj.) impenetrable, incapable of being affected

   The new armor is impervious to any and all attacks by modern weaponry.

   539. impetuous (adj.) rash; hastily done

   Harriet’s hasty words were the product of her impetuous nature.

   540. impinge a. (v.) to impact, affect, make an impression; b. (v.) to encroach, infringe

   a.) Harold’s act of heroism truly impinged all who witnessed it, exhorting them to do likewise.

   b.) Pauline's need for space started to impinge on the space that clearly belonged to her co-workers.

   541. implacable (adj.) incapable of being appeased or mitigated

   The combatants were so betaken by their bloodlust, each was altogether implacable.

   542. implement a. (n.) an instrument, utensil, tool; b. (v.) to put into effect, to institute

   a.) The surgeon ensured that all of his implement were thoroughly sterile.

   b.) The high tech company decided to implement new security protocols.

   543. implicit (adj.) understood but not outwardly obvious; implied

   There was an implicit message behind Mr. Brookson's well crafted words: get busy, or get out!

   544. impregnable (adj.) resistant to capture or penetration

   Fort Lang was thought to be impregnable, until an enemy tank bulldozed through its stone gate.

   545. impudent (adj.) casually rude, insolent, impertinent

   It never ceases to amaze me how today's young people can be so impudent to their elders.

   546. impute (v.) to ascribe, blame

   The conference winning coach chose to impute to his played the total credit for their victories.

   547. inane (adj.) silly and meaningless

   The comic's jokes were completely inane, appealing more to twelve year olds than adults.

   548. inarticulate (adj.) incapable of expressing oneself clearly through speech

   Because the inventor was so inarticulate, she just used pictures and spokespeople to make her pitch.

   549. incarnate a. (adj.) existing in the flesh, embodied; b. (v.) to give human form to

   a.) That beast was fury and death incarnate, clawing and biting at anything that moved.

   b.) Sharon's desire for love was so real; she incarnated it and gave it a name.

   550. incendiary a. (n.) a person who agitates; b. (adj.) inflammatory, causing combustion

   a.) Darell's gossipy habits earned him the reputation as an incendiary.

   b.) Gasoline is the most incendiary liquid on the market.

   551. incessant (adj.) unending

   The baby's incessant crying drove the young mother to the brink of a nervous breakdown.

   552. inchoate (adj.) unformed or formless, in a beginning stage

   The inchoate form of an embryo causes some to mistakenly conclude that it's not a viable being at all.

   553. incisive (adj.) clear, sharp, direct

   Plato's incisive questions caused both debaters to get straight to the point they needed to make.

   554. inclination (n.) a tendency, propensity

   Susan had an inclination to drop her chemistry class but fortunately changed her mind.

   554. incontrovertible (adj.) indisputable

   The prosecutor's evidence was incontrovertible; the defendant was guilty without doubt.

   555. incorrigible (adj.) incapable of correction, delinquent
   When young people are allowed to break laws with impunity, they will certainly become incorrigible.

   556. increment (n.) an enlargement; the process of increasing

   The flood waters grew in increments, increasing with each successive dam burst.

   557. incumbent a. (n.) one who holds an office; b. (adj.) obligatory

   a.) During war time, an incumbent candidate always has an edge on anyone else running.

   b.) It's morally incumbent upon all who are financially able to help those who are not!

   558. indefatigable (adj.) incapable of defeat, failure, decay

   Even after jogging the uphill route, the indefatigable runner kept on going to the finish line.

   559. indigenous (adj.) originating in a region

   When invasive species come in to any area, the indigenous life forms will be threatened.

   560. indigent (adj.) very poor, impoverished

   Many of those holding their I-will-work-for-food signs are truly indigent, having only the clothes on their backs.

   561. indignation (n.) anger sparked by something unjust or unfair

   I resigned from my father's fraternity because of my indignation at its hazing practices.

   562. indolent (adj.) lazy

   Offering indolent people a real job is a total waste of time.

   563. indomitable (adj.) not capable of being conquered

   The Miami Heat was truly an indomitable team during the 2010 - 2011 season!

   564. induce (v.) to bring about, stimulate

   The doctor said, “Don’t induce vomiting; just drink plenty of water.”

   565. ineffable (adj.) unspeakable, not able to be expressed in words

   The scene of the Nile Valley in spring left me speechless; it was truly ineffable.

   566. inept (adj.) unsuitable or incapable, not qualified

   Carlos demonstrated that he was indeed an inept singer, hitting sour note after sour note in his solo.

   567. inexorable (adj.) incapable of being persuaded or placated

   The inexorable march of the troops, with their minds fixed on vengeance, led them headlong to their own disaster.

   568. inextricable (adj.) hopelessly tangled or entangled

   “Understanding is an inextricable component of true wisdom,” taught Professor Sage.

   569. infamy (n.) notoriety, extreme ill repute

   The infamy of the Jesse and Frank James gang lives to this very day.

   570. infusion (n.) an injection of one substance into another

   The economy needs a major and rapid infusion of flowing, spendable cash.

   571. ingenious (adj.) clever, resourceful

   The general was the most ingenious of all the battle leaders, figuring out his enemy’s tactics and thwarting them on every turn.

   572. ingenuous (adj.) not devious; innocent and candid

   The young man’s plea was so heart wrenching that his ingenuous character could not be denied.

   573. inhibit (v.) to prevent, restrain, stop

   An innutritious diet will at some point inhibit a person’s good health.

   574. inimical (adj.) hostile, enemy-like

   The inimical undertones of those at the peace talks suggested that peace was still a distant reality.

   575. iniquity (n.) wickedness or sin

   “Your iniquity,” said the preacher to the unrepentant sinner, “will not be forgiven.”

   576. injunction (n.) an order of official warning

   Judge Hill issued a temporary injunction to freeze the assets of the criminal suspect until a complete investigation could be conducted.

   577. innate (adj.) inborn, native, inherent

   Quinton had great innate ability to both compose and play beautiful music.

   578. innocuous (adj.) harmless, inoffensive

   Most domestic spider bites are completely innocuous, harming only creatures as tiny as their would-be prey.

   579. innovate (v.) to do something in an unprecedented way

   Young minds come up with many and unique innovative strategies to get work done in fun and easy ways.

   580. innuendo (n.) an insinuation

   During the debate, the politician made several innuendos about plight of those on Medicare and Medicaid.

   581. inoculate (v.) to vaccinate against a disease.
   In order to increase immunity against malaria, the travelers to the South American jungles were inoculated two weeks before their trip.

   582. inquisitor (n.) one who inquires, especially in a hostile manner

   The inquisitor was instructed to ask convoluted questions in order to confuse the citizens
   and get them to confess to crimes they’d not committed.

   583. insatiable (adj.) incapable of being satisfied

   My appetite for fresh fish is truly insatiable; I can eat it every day of my life.

   584. insidious (adj.) appealing, but imperceptibly harmful, seductive

   Lisa’s insidious compliments were designed to guide her victims into a false sense of security.

   585. insinuate (v.) to suggest indirectly or subtly

   “I didn’t mean to insinuate that you weren’t welcome,” insisted the embarrassed host.

   586. insipid (adj.) dull, boring

   The show was terribly insipid from beginning to end; those who didn’t fall asleep, left early.

   587. insolent (adj.) rude, arrogant, overbearing

   The kind of insolent behavior the boss’s son showed demonstrates a lack of parental involvement and oversight in theyoung man’s life.

   588. instigate (v.) to urge, goad

   Those who instigate fights are just as much to blame as those who actually engage in them.

   589. insular (adj.) separated and narrow-minded; tight-knit, closed off

   Sometimes, insular communities adopt habits of mind that blind them to the concepts embraced by society at large.

   590. insurgent (n.) one who rebels

   An insurgent force made its way toward the capital, with ill intentions.

   591. integral (adj.) necessary for completeness

   The messengers played an integral role in the success of the negotiations.

   592. interject (v.) to insert between other things

   Please allow me to interject one other idea before our final conclusion is reached.

   593. interlocutor (n.) someone who participates in a dialogue or conversation

   As one interlocutor said to another, “Let’s maintain our civility at all times during these discussions.”

   594. interminable (adj.) without possibility of end

   The questioning mind of men has been an attribute that has aided in their technical evolution and therefore must remain interminable.

   595. intimation (n.) an indirect suggestion

   The coach’s intimation was that his team would rally and defeat their arch enemy in the end.

   596. intractable (adj.) difficult to manipulate, unmanageable

   The conduct of testosterone-driven athletes is intractable, especially after a big win.

   597. intransigent (adj.) refusing to compromise, often on an extreme opinion

   The intransigent young woman said she was entitled to the house, the furniture, the car, the boat, and every penny in their joint account.

   598. intrepid (adj.) brave in the face of danger
   The intrepid soldier said he was just doing his job when he braved the bullets and flame throwers to save his comrades.

   599. inundate (v.) to flood with abundance

   “I’m completely inundated with house work!” complained the new bride.

   600. inure (v.) to cause one to become accustomed or acclimated
   After a life time of living in the squalor of extreme poverty, Jason and his sister became

   inured to it, and later saw it as normal and even proper.

   601. invective (n.) an angry verbal attack
   The officer's use of invectives against an insolent, very drunk driver earned him a reprimand.

   602. inveterate (adj.) stubbornly established by habit

   After four years of serious college work, I'd become an inveterate studier and thinker.

   603. inviolable (adj.) secure from assault
   Those in control of their tempers are usually utterly inviolable to verbal attack.

   604. irascible (adj.) easily angered

   The irascible Daffy Duck is one of my all time favorite cartoon characters.

   605. iridescent (adj.) showing rainbow colors

   There was an eerie iridescent glow coming from the site of the UFO crash.

   606. irreverence (n.) disrespect

   The irreverence shown by the rap singers was such an insult to effectual worshipers.

   607. irrevocable (adj.) incapable of being taken back

   The Bill of Rights establishes Americans' irrevocable rights under the Constitution.

                                                                         J --

   608. jubilant (adj.) extremely joyful, happy

   At her wedding, the bride just burst into jubilant song at the thought of actually having her perfect husband.

   609. judicious (adj.) having or exercising sound judgment

   Spending your grocery money on a quick trip to the casino is not very judicious at all.

   610. juxtaposition (n.) two things placed beside each other for the sake of implicit comparison

   The clever detective saw the subtle difference after juxtaposing the two photographs.

                                                                         K --

   611. knell (n.) the solemn sound of a bell, often indicating a death

   Hearing the solemn knell of the bell told everyone that Mrs. Jennie May had been finally laid to rest.

   612. kudos (n.) praise for an achievement

   After that incredible performance, the reviewers gave cheerful kudos to the new singer.

                                                                         L --

   613. laceration (n.) a cut, tear

   The accident left everyone with bruises and lacerations from head to foot.

   614. laconic (adj.) terse in speech or writing

   The lecturer's laconic style caused him to seen less than sympathetic to his own cause.

   615. languid (adj.) sluggish from fatigue or weakness

   Brandon's bout with the flu left him languid and pale.

   616. larceny (n.) obtaining another’s property by theft or trickery

   After years of victimizing senior citizens with acts of petty larceny, Slick Willie was finally nabbed.

   617. largess (n.) great and lavish generosity in the giving of gifts

   On rare occasions, super rich people demonstrate laudable largess in the buying of homes for the poor and building free hospitals for the
   indigent.

   618. latent (adj.) hidden, but capable of being exposed

   The insidious germ lay latent in its host, waiting for some other sickness to strike first and make its victim vulnerable.

   619. laudatory (adj.) expressing admiration or praise

   Acts of kindness should be met with much more laudatory recognition than they are.

   620. lavish a. (adj.) given without limits; b. (v.) to give without limits

   a.) Lavish praise was heaped upon the officer for his demonstration of awesome valiance.

   b.) Lavish praise upon the worthy that all others may see the virtue and imitate it.

   621. legerdemain (n.) deception, slight-of-hand

   Marvin the Magnificent became world famous for his uncanny skill and legerdemain.

   622. lenient (adj.) demonstrating tolerance or gentleness

   Judge merciless chose not to be lenient in the least with the ten-time offender.

   623. lethargic (adj.) in a state of sluggishness or apathy

   The summer sun in Florida will make even the zestiest exerciser fell lethargic and tired.

   624. liability a. (n.) legal responsibility; b. (n.) a handicap, burden

   a.) The court determined that the driver of the truck had the liability for the blown tires.

   b.) Having unconcerned and undedicated players on any team would be a liability.

   625. libertarian (adj.) advocating principles of liberty and free will

   The libertarian candidate spoke of free will and the volition of each individual.

   626. licentious (adj.) displaying a lack of moral or legal restraints

   The licentious woman said, "Hello, Sugar Pumpkin. Has your little wifey left yet?"

   627. limpid (adj.) clear, transparent

   The so-called zero-fat skim milk was so limpid, you could see straight through it.

   628. linchpin (n.) something that holds separate parts together

   The linchpin in the defense strategy was the absence of any physical evidence.

   629. lithe (adj.) graceful, flexible, supple

   The ballet dancers' lithe movements were akin to watching swans glide over the lake.

   630. litigant (n.) someone engaged in a lawsuit

   The litigant's lawyer warned her that she could loose everything if her witness didn't show.

   631. lucid (adj.) clear, easily understandable

   Dr. Bringham's explanation was so lucid, even the freshmen med students were able to grasp it and all of its subtleties.

   632. luminous (adj.) brightly shining

   The light from the luminous object made night seem just like day.

   633. lurid (adj.) ghastly, sensational

   The murder mystery was replete with twists, turns, and the lurid details that Gosa had become famous for.

                                                                         M --

   634. maelstrom (n.) a destructive whirlpool which rapidly sucks in objects

   During the most violent storms in the Arctic Ocean, enormous maelstroms are formed that could pull any ship to the depths of destruction.

   635. magnanimous (adj.) noble, generous

   The nurse's magnanimous spirit caused her to offer one of her own kidney's to her suffering patient.

   636. malediction (n.) a curse

   The witch looked to her master then turned and spoke her malediction upon all the citizens of the town that had sentenced her to burn.

   637. malevolent (adj.) wanting harm to befall others

   The malevolent old man sat in his room all day, writing dirty letters to young girls.

   638. malleable (adj.) capable of being shaped or transformed

   Because young minds are so malleable, even the worst delinquent can be rehabilitated.

   639. mandate (n.) an authoritative command

   In the New Testament, Jesus mandated that the penitent would receive mercy and grace.

   640. manifest a. (adj.) easily understandable, obvious; b. (v.) to show plainly

   a.) The poet's meaning is clearly manifest when you consider his other writings.

   b.) The strategy was to manifest deep hurt in the eyes of the jury.

   641. manifold (adj.) diverse, varied

   I have manifold reasons for not going; I just mentioned to you the most obvious ones.

   642. maudlin (adj.) weakly sentimental

   The maudlin themes of all the romance comedies are entirely predictable from the boy meets girl, to the boy looses girl, to the boy gets girl
   back elements.

   643. maverick (n.) an independent, nonconformist person

   The suspense writer didn't think of himself as a maverick; he was just writing what he thought was usual stuff.

   644. mawkish (adj.) characterized by sick sentimentality

   The mawkishness of yesterday's television story lines was displayed as normal living situations of normal American families.

   645. maxim (n.) a common saying expressing a principle of conduct

   The chief maxim of the day is this: Do unto others as you would have them do unto you.

   646. meager (adj.) deficient in size or quality

   The meager portion of food did not satisfy Harold's enormous appetite.

   647. medley (n.) a mixture of differing things

   The orchestra played a medley of oldies but goodies.

   648. mendacious (adj.) having a lying, false character

   The mendacious reputation of Snake MacFarady caused everyone to turn down his offer to go into business with him and his brother.

   649. mercurial (adj.) characterized by rapid change or temperament

   Sally was so mercurial before her test results came, no one knew what to say to her.

   650. meritorious (adj.) worthy of esteem or reward

   Bernice's meritorious gesture was hailed by all as the perfect peace-making move.

   651. metamorphosis (n.) the change of form, shape, substance

   The metamorphosis that the main character went through is proof positive that sinners can become saints.

   652. meticulous (adj.) extremely careful with details

   The surgeon was very meticulous about the care of the patient's wound.

   653. mitigate (v.) to make less violent, alleviate

   In an attempt to mitigate the squabble between the brothers, their father took blame for most of the problem.

   654. moderate a. (adj.) not extreme; b. (n.) one who expresses moderate opinions

   a.) The damage was deemed moderate by the adjustor, giving the owners much less than they expected.

   b.) I consider myself a moderate, especially when it comes to social help networks.

   655. modicum (n.) a small amount of something

   Just a modicum of patience will keep a person out of many jams.

   656. modulate (v.) to pass from one state to another, especially in music

   The technicians are attempting to modulate the frequencies of the incoming signals.

   657. mollify (v.) to soften in temper

   Hank's apology certainly went a long way in mollifying Alfred's hostility.

   658. morass (n.) a wet swampy bog; figuratively, something that traps and confuses

   Wading through the morass at a turtle's pace, the hikers took many hours to reach the town.

   659. mores (n.) the moral attitudes and fixed customs of a group of people.

   Social mores impact the development of a society and the expectations of those who live there in.

   670. morose (adj.) gloomy or sullen

   Jasper’s morose disposition made him very unpleasant to ever be around.

   671. multifarious (adj.) having great diversity or variety

   The reason I love Swiss army knives is because of their multifarious, do-everything design.

   672. mundane (adj.) concerned with the world rather than with heaven, commonplace

   The mundane concerns of the uninspired oftentimes seem very trivial to those who visit the muses often.

   673. munificence (n.) generosity in giving

   The extent of the billionaire's munificence astounded even those who knew him well.

   674. mutable (adj.) able to change

   The decisions of the uncertain thinker tend to be very mutable.

   675. myriad (adj.) consisting of a very great number

   There are myriad things to do on an ocean cruise, unless, of course you are a land lover.

                                                                         N --

   676. nadir (n.) the lowest point of something

   The nadir of my existence came when my one and only love found someone else.

   677. nascent (adj.) in the process of being born or coming into existence

   The nascent genius of the young students in Dr. Einstein's class was evident when some of them actually challenged some of his assumptions on
   relativity.

   678. nebulous (adj.) vaguely defined, cloudy

   I found the teacher's explanation of the events very nebulous, as they were filled with imprecise allusions and hints.

   679. nefarious (adj.) heinously villainous

   The nefarious pirates arrived on the shores of the town with crossbones waving.

   680. negligent (adj.) habitually careless, neglectful

   At some point, negligent behavior leads to disappointment, if not total ruin.

   681. neophyte (n.) someone who is young or inexperienced

   Though Joel was a neophyte, he handled the emergency with the comportment of a veteran.

   682. nocturnal (adj.) relating to or occurring during the night

   Because bats are nocturnal creatures, they live for the moon.

   683. noisome (adj.) unpleasant, offensive, especially to the sense of smell

   The noisome stench of the carcass permeated the whole building, driving the employees to the parking lot.

   684. nomadic (adj.) wandering from place to place

   The nomadic tribesmen move so often, it's impossible to know their whereabouts at all times.

   685. nominal (adj.) trifling, insignificant

   Because there was only a nominal fee involved, Mr. T. Wad paid the cost for everyone.

   686. nonchalant (adj.) having a lack of concern, indifference

   I was shocked at how nonchalant Jennifer handled the news of her expulsion.

   687. nondescript (adj.) lacking a distinctive character

   Undercover detectives are pros at coming across as nondescript observers and passersby.

   688. notorious (adj.) widely and unfavorably known

   The fraternity became notorious for its crazy parties and weird inductions ceremonies.

   689. novice (n.) a beginner, someone without training or experience

   During the game, the novice players contributed just as much as the others.

   690. noxious (adj.) harmful, unwholesome

   The noxious fumes simply overwhelmed the investigators as well as all others within a two-block radius.

   691. nuance (n.) a slight variation in meaning, tone, or expression

   There was but a nuance of difference between the shade I wanted and the shade they had in stock.

   692. nurture (v.) to assist the development of

   The nurture of a loving mother has no substitute.

                                                                         O --

   693. obdurate (adj.) unyielding to persuasion or stubbornly insensitive to change

   The young men were as obdurate as the long bearded men of the sea when it came to changing their ways.

   694. obfuscate (v.) to render incomprehensible

   The coding mechanism obfuscated the program, rendering it undecipherable.

   695. oblique (adj.) diverging from a straight line or course, not straightforward

   The river's course was oblique, twisting and turning all the way to the ocean.

   696. oblivious (adj.) lacking consciousness or awareness of something

   The naive travelers were oblivious to the tactics of the big city slickers.

   697. obscure (adj.) unclear, partially hidden

   Thought the markings were obscure, our linguists were able to decode most of them.

   698. obsequious (adj.) excessively compliant or submissive

   The imprisoned women were strangely obsequious to their captors, suggesting some type of mind control.

   699. obsolete (adj.) no longer used, out of date

   The type writer has become an obsolete business tool.

   700. obstinate (adj.) not yielding easily, very stubborn

   Even after hours of enhanced interrogation, the spies remained obstinate and closed mouthed.

   701. obstreperous (adj.) noisy, unruly

   The obstreperous class frustrated the rookie teacher such that she simply walked out.

   702. obtuse (adj.) lacking quickness of sensibility or intellect

   The obtuse ball players thought nothing of exchanging insults with the opposing team.

   703. odious (adj.) instilling hatred or intense displeasure

   The convict's words to the jury were odious from beginning to end.

   704. officious (adj.) insisting on helping when it's neither wanted nor needed

   The new boss was much too officious, telling everybody how to do the jobs they already knew how to do.

   705. ominous (adj.) foreboding or foreshadowing evil; threatening

   The rolling of thunder was an ominous sound, frightening children and adults alike.

   706. onerous (adj.) burdensome

   Having to clean the stables alone is an onerous chore that no one wants to do.

   707. opulent (adj.) characterized by rich abundance verging on ostentation

   The mansion was decorated with the most opulent furnishings I've ever seen.

   708. oration (n.) a speech delivered in a formal or ceremonious manner

   The speaker's oration was well paced and loquaciously delivered.

   709. ornate (adj.) highly elaborate, excessively decorated

   The Yuletide decorations were truly ornate, from the tree to the windows to the sidewalks.

   710. orthodox (adj.) conventional, conforming to established protocol

   Because of their orthodox thinking the elders wouldn't even consider any so-called new fangled ideas.

   711. oscillate (v.) to sway from one side to the other

   Melvin's little oscillating fan hummed all night, trying its best to cool the whole room.

   712. ostensible (adj.) appearing as such, seemingly

   Ostensibly, those who refused to follow directions the first time were sent home.

   713. ostentatious (adj.) excessively showy, glitzy

   Most of the out of town guests thought the hostess's flamboyant way was too ostentatious.

   714. ostracism (n.) exclusion from a group

   After Brad's ostracism from his club, he simply wandered around regretting his egregious actions.

                                                                         P --

   715. pacific (adj.) soothing

   Trying to pacify both sides, the mediator proposed many compromises.

   716. palatable (adj.) agreeable to the taste or sensibilities

   That chocolate cake was the most palatable item on the table, even better than the pie.

   717. palette (adj.) a range of colors or qualities

   The multi-national palette of the quilt was seen as the greatest gesture of peace, soothing even the most ardent of attendees.

   718. palliate (v.) to reduce the severity of, ameliorate

   Attempting to palliate the pain, Dr. Melcott increased the morphine dosage.

   719. pallid (adj.) lacking color

   The decorations were unique, but the bland color choices were a bit pallid for my taste.

   720. panacea (n.) a remedy for all ills or difficulties

   There are no panaceas in the real world; however, an apple a day might be the closest.

   721. paradigm (n.) an example that is a perfect pattern or model

   Using computers as primary teaching tools is certainly a paradigm shift for our teachers.

   722. paradox (n.) an apparently contradictory statement that is perhaps true

   The notion time travel presents a multitude of paradoxes that are just beginning to be understood.

   723. paragon (n.) a model of excellence or perfection

   Hercules is a paragon of the traditional hero type -- powerful, brave, and good.

   724. paramount (adj.) greatest in importance, rank, character

   The paramount issue here is not his condition; it's the condition of his vast estate.

   725. pariah (n.) an outcast, a repulsive person

   After her expulsion from the Ladies' Club International, Shelia became somewhat of a

   pariah, finding no other club that would take her.

   726. parody (n.) a satirical imitation

   Saturday Night Live is one of the most noted television shows to ever use parody as its chief means of humor.

   727. parsimony (n.) frugality, stinginess

   The old miser's parsimony caused him to choose to eat cat food instead of steak.

   728. partisan (n.) a follower, adherent

   During national emergencies, there's no time or place for partisan politics; everyone must follow the designated leader's plan.

   729. patent (adj.) readily seen or understood, clear

   When Janette didn't even know the combination to her husband's safe, it became patently  clear what the problem really was.

   730. pathology (n.) a deviation from the normal; study of disease

   The pathology report made it clear that the tumor had definitely stopped growing, and was perhaps even shrinking.

   731. pathos (n.) an emotion of sympathy

   Even the perpetrators showed sincere pathos for the stricken family.

   732. paucity (adj.) small in quantity

   Dwayne felt the paucity of available food meant that everyone should eat smaller portions, starting with him.

   733. pejorative (adj.) derogatory, uncomplimentary

   Mitch's pejorative comments to his wife were seen as proof positive that he no longer cared nor even respected her.

   734. pellucid (adj.) easily intelligible, clear

   The mountain streams were so pellucid the brown and orange stones on the bottom could be seen with ease.

   735. penchant (n.) a tendency, partiality, preference

   Jeff's penchant for the dramatic had a perfect forum during the impending storm surge.

   736. penitent (adj.) remorseful, regretful

   Marvin the Murderer didn't seem the least bit penitent for his crimes; in fact, he smiled when they were mentioned.

   737. penultimate (adj.) next to last

   I believe Jim's penultimate solution was better than the one he ultimately chose.

   738. penurious (adj.) miserly, stingy

   Estelle's penurious habits caused her and her children to walk around in worn and tattered clothes.

   739. perfidious (adj.) disloyal, unfaithful

   Even after he got married, it was hard for the swinging bachelor to give up his perfidious ways.

   740. perfunctory (adj.) showing little interest or enthusiasm

   The newsman delivered the bad news in such a perfunctory manner, it seemed as though it was just another run of the mill event.

   741. permeate (v.) to spread throughout, saturate

   Leaven, or yeast, tends to permeate everything it touches.

   742. pernicious (adj.) extremely destructive or harmful

   The pernicious intent of the invaders was made very evident when they drew their swords. 

   743. perplex (v.) to confuse

   A good military leader will always attempt to perplex his foes with some strategy.

   744. perspicacity (adj.) shrewdness, perceptiveness

   Because of Will's perspicacity, he figured out the problem before it had a chance to grow.

   745. pert (adj.) flippant, bold

   I thought Betty's manner was a bit too pert, as she responded to her mother's questions.

   746. pertinacious (adj.) stubbornly persistent

   The twins had a pertinacious spirit that drove them to stick to their guns no matter what.

   747. perusal (n.) a careful examination, review

   After careful perusal of the layouts, we saw where the leaks had to be coming from.

   748. pervasive (adj.) having the tendency to spread throughout

   The airborne plague became pervasive throughout the countryside, once the winds changed.

   749. petulance (n.) rudeness, irritability

   Such petulance demonstrated by anyone suggests a lack of respect for age and position.

   750. philanthropic (adj.) charitable, giving

   The Tycoon's philanthropic gesture fed thousands and housed tens of thousands.

   751. phlegmatic (adj.) uninterested, unresponsive

   Monica became wholly phlegmatic when she found out their play wasn't going to be televised or even written about in the local paper.

   752. pillage (v.) to seize or plunder, especially in war

   The pillage left in the wake of the Viking's raid left the village destitute of food and gold.

   753. pinnacle (n.) the highest point

   When an athlete is at the pinnacle of his career, his skill level is simply off the charts.

   754. pithy (adj.) concisely meaningful

   I love quotes and proverbs, especially the pithy varieties that say so much in so few words.

   755. pittance (n.) a very small amount, especially relating to money

   The only jobs available to the uneducated pay only a pittance, nothing near what it takes to support a family.

   756. placate (v.) to ease the anger of, soothe

   To placate the angry fans, the organization decided to offer free tickets to the next game.

   757. placid (adj.) calm, peaceful

   The placid lake surface looked like a sheet of emerald glass, glistening in the sunlight.

   758. platitude (n.) an uninspired remark, cliché

   Sometimes, platitudes are used when nothing original can be thought of to say.

   759. plaudits (n.) enthusiastic approval, applause

   The plaudits given to the performance were an indication of the audience's approval.

   760. plausible (adj.) believable, reasonable

   The detective's theory didn't seem plausible at first; but, after some musing, it was seen as the only thing that could possibly be right.

   761. plenitude (n.) an abundance

   After the fierce rains, there was certainly a plenitude of fresh water for people and plants alike.

   762. plethora (n.) an abundance, excess

   There are a plethora of reasons why we should all tell the truth; all of them, however, eluded me that day.

   763. pliable (adj.) flexible

   The reeds of certain plants are so pliable they can be used to make very strong ropes.

   764. poignant (adj.) deeply affecting, moving

   The message of that movie was quite poignant, causing the audience to think and re- think their own values.

   765. polemic (n.) an aggressive argument against a specific opinion

   Alberto's polemic served to rebut his opponent and introduce a new view of reality.

   766. portent (n.) an omen

   The witch's words were an ominous portent of tragedies to come for the great king.

   767. potable (adj.) suitable for drinking

   Creek water can be potable when spring water id scarce.

   768. potentate (n.) one who has great power, a ruler

   Nebuchadnezzar was one of the greatest potentates the world has ever known.

   769. pragmatic (adj.) practical

   Nancy's suggestion proved to be one of the most pragmatic to be discussed all day.

   770. precipice (n.) the face of a cliff, a steep or overhanging place

   Looking down from the icy precipice, the alpha wolf chose its prey.

   771. preclude (v.) to prevent

   Concern for the welfare of others should preclude a person from ever even considering taking advantage of anyone.

   772. precocious (adj.) advanced, developing ahead of time

   Polly Ann was the most precocious child in the class, many times beating her teacher to the answers.

   773. predilection (n.) a preference or inclination for something

   Due to Claud's predilection for sea food, his choice of evening fare was always predictable.

   774. preponderance (adj.) superiority in importance or quantity

   The preponderance of evidence pointed conclusively to the accused.

   775. prepossessing (adj.) preoccupying the mind to the exclusion of all else

   Job's prepossessing thoughts were of Gloria only -- morning, noon, and night.

   776. presage (n.) an omen

   The sight of the dreaded albatross was the presage most disdained by old seamen.

   777. prescient (adj.) to have foreknowledge of events

   Maggie was quite prescient, seeing the future as though it were the past.

   778. prescribe (v.) to lay down a rule

   The doctor prescribed several pills, multicolored and expensive.

   779. presumptuous (adj.) disrespectfully bold

   Clyde, being the presumptuous lad that he was, went to pick up his prom date and found her already gone with someone else.

   780. pretense (n.) an appearance or action intended to deceive

   His anguish over her death was but a pretense, a ruse to suggest his own innocence.

   781. primeval (adj.) original, ancient

   His suit was the color of primeval metal, brown and gray mixed with red.

   782. privation (n.) lacking basic necessities

   Losing his job added tremendously to his family's privation and pain.

   783. probity (n.) virtue, integrity
   Helen's probity was in question when it appeared that she had lied to the investigators.

   784. proclivity (n.) a strong inclination toward something

   Because of human proclivity, there will always be crime and guile in the world.

   785. procure (v.) to obtain, acquire

   Trying to procure sustenance, the hungry man reluctantly stole from total strangers.

   786. profane (adj.) lewd, indecent

   Stanley was suspended from school for three days for using profane language.

   787. profligate (adj.) dissolute, extravagant

   The profligate shopper went to every store in the mall, buying many things she didn't need and couldn't afford.

   788. profuse (adj.) plentiful, abundant

   After the ten-mile run in the 90 degree heat, the track team was dripping with profuse sweat.

   789. promulgate (v.) to proclaim, make known

   To promulgate the notion of ethnic superiority with not a shred of objective evidence is an act of idiocy.

   790. propagate (v.) to multiply, spread out

   Insects have learned to propagate their species in the most dire of survival circumstances.

   791. propensity (n.) an inclination, preference

   Those whose trust has been abused must guard against developing a propensity to mistrust everyone.

   792. propitious (adj.) favorable

   As the propitious moment arrived at last, the signal was given, and the race began.

   793. propriety (n.) the quality or state of being proper, decent

   Observing the dictates of social propriety, Evelyn allowed her guest to be seated first.

   794. prosaic (adj.) plain, lacking liveliness

   The plot of the play was rather prosaic, having characters that sat around and slept for hours, and didn’t bother to even dream.

   795. proscribe (v.) to condemn, outlaw

   The court proscribed a sentence of not less than thirty years and not more than fifty.

   796. protean (adj.) able to change shape; displaying great variety

   Chief among Samuel's protean talents was the ability to start a fire with his mind.

   797. prowess (n.) extraordinary ability

   The knight displayed his fight prowess by defeating the emerald-eyed dragon of Coal Mountain.

   798. prudence (n.) cautious, circumspect

   Prudence would dictate that one should get to know on a personal basis those with whom one shares secrets.

   799. prurient (adj.) eliciting or possessing an extraordinary interest in sex

   Thanks to the internet, many adolescents have prurient interests that would flabbergast their parents.

   800. puerile (adj.) juvenile, immature

   The young man was lectured by his professor for his puerile actions and told to go home and grow up.

   801. pugnacious (adj.) quarrelsome, combative

   Pit bulls are infamous for their pugnacious dispositions, fighting anything at any time.

   802. pulchritude (n.) physical beauty

   In today's world, women possessing the greatest degree of pulchritude are called supermodels.

   803. punctilious (adj.) eager to follow rules or conventions

   There's nothing worse than an IRS agent who’s punctilious by nature and choice.

   804. pungent (adj.) having a pointed, sharp quality (often describing smells)

   The pungent odor of bleach pervaded the hallways, blocking them, as it were, with its chemical barricade.

   805. punitive (adj.) involving punishment

   When speeders are caught speeding through school zones, punitive measures are and should be guaranteed.

   806. putrid (adj.) rotten, foul

   The putrid stench of the road kill was all over his new tires!

                                                                         Q --

   807. quagmire (n.) a difficult situation

   Playing video games when you should be studying is one of the easiest ways to put yourself in an academic quagmire.

   808. quaint (adj.) charmingly old-fashioned

   During our vacation in the mountains, we chanced to stay at a quaint little bed and breakfast.

   809. quandary (n.) a perplexing, bad situation

   When my car stopped cold in the middle of a thunder storm, I knew I was in a quandary.

   810. quell (v.) to control or diffuse a potentially explosive situation

   To quell the violence in the streets, the National Guard had to be called in.

   811. querulous (adj.) whiny, complaining

   The passenger in the last seat is a querulous sort, complaining about the food, the service, and everything else near him.

   812. quixotic (adj.) idealistic, impractical

   The quixotic cartoon fan wrote many letters to Bugs Bunny, asking him about his friend, Daffy Duck.

   813. quotidian (adj.) daily

   Intent on tending to his quotidian chores, Mr. Simon focuses on nothing else.

                                                                         R --

   814. rail (v.) to scold, protest

   The tenured teachers began to rail against the lack of a cost of living increase.

   815. rancid (adj.) having a terrible taste or smell

   The meat in the box was terribly rancid; its odor was all over the house.

   816. rancor (n.) deep, bitter resentment

   When the will was read, the jilted spouse was brimming with rancor when her late husband's estate was left to some woman he called Jessie Bell.

   817. rapport (n.) mutual understanding and harmony

   It's a difficult task to develop a rapport with someone who’s naturally introverted.

   818. rash (adj.) hasty, incautious

   Don't be so rash in your judgment, Jonas; he may not be as bad as you think.

   819. raucous (adj.) loud, boisterous
   Maria's raucous friends were over again last night, laughing, cursing, and singing their naughty songs.

   820. raze (v.) to demolish, level

   The demolition crew was called in to raze the condemned building before the hurricane season arrived.

   821. rebuke (v.) to scold, criticize
   Mr. Thomas rebuked his son sharply for missing his curfew for the second time this week.

   822. recalcitrant (adj.) defiant, unapologetic
   The drunk driver was recalcitrant and rude to the officers; thus, he got to spend ninety days in the county stockade.

   823. recapitulate (v.) to sum up, repeat

   The speaker began to recapitulate his main points, warning that they all must be remembered and acted upon.

   824. reciprocate (v.) to give in return

   The Bonner's were so cordial to us we felt the need to reciprocate their invitation.

   825. reclusive (adj.) solitary, shunning society

   The reclusive clan moved back into the deep woods, away from every human being.

   826. reconcile a. (v.) to return to harmony; b. (v.) to make consistent with existing ideas

   a.) The couple wanted to be reconciled, but didn't know how to work through their problems.

   b.) Several accountants were called in to reconcile the expenditures with the cash on hand.

   827. rectitude (n.) uprightness, extreme morality

   A high degree of rectitude should be a requisite for anyone serving in a public office.

   828. redoubtable a. (adj.) formidable; b. (adj.) commanding respect

   a.) The attacking force was so redoubtable, the defending troops cowered silently.

   b.) The redoubtable commander entered the barracks and everyone stood at attention.

   829. refract (v.) to distort, change

   The light was refracted as it passed through the prism, breaking into a full spectrum.

   830. refurbish (v.) to restore, clean up

   For Mother's Day, we decided to refurbish her favorite rocking chair.

   831. refute (v.) to prove wrong

   Martin was set to refute every argument, but heard nothing with which he disagreed.

   832. regurgitate a. (v.) to vomit ; b. (v.) to throw back exactly

   a.) Sticking his fingers down his throat, Morris was trying to force himself to regurgitate.

   b.) After studying his science chapters all night, Willie just regurgitated the information.

   833. relegate a. (v.) to assign to the proper place; b. (v.) to assign to an inferior place

   a.) The experts from the Bureau were quickly relegated to the evidence room.

   b.) After her last debacle, Miriam was relegated to the laundry room to help wash and iron uniforms.

   834. relish (v.) to enjoy

   Seeing the chocolate covered Strawberries that he relished so, Bob almost cried.

   835. remedial (adj.) intended to repair gaps in students’ basic knowledge

   Because he scored so low on his assessment, Nolan was placed in a remedial class.

   836. remiss (adj.) negligent, failing to take care

   "It would be remiss of me not to mention our visitors," said Headmaster Belford.

   837. renovate a. (v.) restore, return to original state; b. (v.) to enlarge and beautify

   a.) The guest house was renovated so his mother could use it during her stay.

   b.) After she renovated the library, she was able the store more books, and even host formal gatherings.

   838. renown (n.) honor, acclaim

   Einstein gained even greater renown when the A-Bomb actually worked as forecasted.

   839. renunciation (n.) a rejection

   Maximillian's renunciation of his own government left many to wonder about his true allegiance.

   840. repentant (adj.) penitent, sorry

   Not being repentant in the least, George simply threatened to slap her again.

   841. replete (adj.) full, abundant

   The student's final paper was replete with spelling errors, punctuation errors, and confusing phrases.

   842. repose (v.) to rest, lie down

   The weary traveler stopped in the shade and reposed himself on the ground, leaning against an apple tree.

   843. reprehensible (adj.) deserving rebuke

   The child molester's reprehensible conduct was found by the jury to be worthy of a life sentence.

   844. reprieve (n.) a temporary delay of punishment

   The governor granted a reprieve to the convict, citing an incident that happened during his incarceration.

   845. reproach (v.) to scold, disapprove

   The teacher was reproached by her principal for showing improper movies to her class.

   846. reprobate (adj.) evil, unprincipled

   The reprobate murderer sat in his cell, thinking of revenge against his self-assigned enemies.

   847. reprove (v.) to scold, rebuke

   The Bible reproves every evil act that men do, warning them to stop before it's too late.

   848. repudiate (v.) to reject, refuse to accept

   The career criminal made a plea to the judge; but, it was repudiated with the words that touted justice and in the  name of community safety.

   849. repulse a. (v.) to disgust; b. (v.) to push back

   a.) I found her suggestion utterly repulsive, and I scolded her for thinking such a thing.

   b.) The wall of water was slowly but surely repulsed by the shifting winds.

   850. reputable (adj.) of good reputation

   Only reputable individuals are considered for the jury pool.

   851. requisition (n.) a demand for goods, usually made by an authority

   The requisition came in on time; however, several items were listed as back-ordered.

   852. rescind (v.) to take back, repeal

   After second thought, the principal decided to rescind her permission to have a school- wide party.

   853. reservoir a. (n.) reserves, large supply; b. (n.) a body of stored water

   a.) There's a reservoir of office supplies yet unopened in the secretaries' vault.

   b.) Hoover Dam creates one of the largest reservoirs of fresh water in the world.

   854. resilient (adj.) able to recover from misfortune; able to withstand adversity

   The resilient young player healed quickly and returned to his team in no time.

   855. resolute (adj.) firm, determined

   Jim was totally resolute in his decision not to allow extended vacations, even under the pressure of old friendships and rain checks.

   856. resolve a. (v.) to find a solution; b. (v.) to firmly decide

   a.) A mediator was called in to resolve the conflict that had lasted for months.

   b.) My friend's sickness tested my resolve to never surrender to impatience and disloyalty.

   857. respite (n.) a break, rest

   The pause in the storm offered a brief but desperately needed respite.

   858. resplendent (adj.) shiny, glowing

   The polished marble was exquisite and resplendent under the yellow lights.

   859. restitution (n.) restoration to the rightful owner

   The police ensured that the theft victims received full restitution of their possessions.

   860. restive (adj.) resistant, stubborn, impatient

   The youngsters became very restive, as the speaker went on and on, taking up their play time.

   861. retract (v.) withdraw

   The newspaper decided to retract its entire statement about one of the candidates when a portion of it proved to be false.

   862. revel (v.) to enjoy intensely
   The plan was to pass the final, catch a flight, land safely, then revel till early dawn.

   863. revere (v.) to esteem, show deference, venerate

   The boys had been taught to revere the name of the founder of their school, removing theirs hats at the mention of his name.

   864. revoke (v.) to take back

   After the food fight in the cafeteria, the headmaster decided to revoke all off-campus privileges.

   865. rhapsodize (v.) to engage in excessive enthusiasm

   My mother often rhapsodizes in her oldies-but-goodies songfest every weekend.

   866. ribald (adj.) coarsely, crudely humorous

   Ribald humor is not allowed to be expressed in the presence of minors or the elderly.

   867. rife (adv.) abundant

   Rife with excuses, the teenagers came completely unprepared for their final exam.

   868. ruminate (v.) to contemplate, reflect

   While ruminating on the day's activities, it occurred to me that not everyone was present.

   869. ruse (n.) a trick

   Clint and Junior used a clever ruse to outwit the grizzly man and his little brother.

                                                                         S --

   870. saccharine (adj.) sickeningly sweet

   The saccharine manner of kiss-ups is enough to make anyone want to barf.

   871. sacrosanct (adj.) holy, something that should not be criticized

   There is no doubt, in American culture the Bible is the most sacrosanct of all volumes.

   872. sagacity (n.) shrewdness, soundness of perspective

   With the sagacity of Holmes himself, the junior detective read the clues and solved the crime.

   873. salient (adj.) significant, conspicuous

   The most salient topic broached by any speaker was the topic of early childhood learning.

   874. salutation (n.) a greeting

   Joseph's salutation was so warm and heart-felt; we knew instantly that we were really welcomed there.

   875. salve (n.) a soothing balm

   As the nurse rubbed the salve in to the wound, the burning stopped immediately.

   876. sanctimonious (adj.) giving a hypocritical appearance of piety

   Sanctimonious preachers cause so many to disbelieve the genuine message of God.

   877. sanguine (adj.) optimistic, cheery

   Though I'm not sanguine about the possibility of overnight guests, the thought is not altogether repulsive.

   878. satiate (v.) to satisfy excessively
   Larry became satiated with sugars after eating a full dozen of cream-filled donuts.

   879. scathing (adj.) sharp, critical, hurtful

   The reporter gave a scathing rundown of every wicked thing the mob boss had done.

   880. scintillating (adj.) sparkling

   The country singer's scintillating rhinestone costume blinded everybody in the front row.

   881. scrupulous (adj.) painstaking, careful in conduct or manner

   Because Karen was so scrupulous, she refused to take the thousand dollars that she found and turned in the police that they in turn returned to
   her.

   882. scurrilous (adj.) vulgar, coarse

   The scurrilous language of the truck drivers greatly offended the young waitress.

   883. sedentary (adj.) sitting, settled

   The sedentary job that I took three months ago has caused me to gain fifteen pounds.

   884. semaphore (n.) a visual signal

   The deaf and hard of hearing tend to communicate with clearly visible semaphores.

   885. seminal (adj.) original, important, creating a field

   The dawning of the age of serious quartz research is seminal; for, it has heretofore only been postulated.

   886. sensual (adj.) involving sensory gratification, usually related to sex

   For many people, taking a warm mud bath is a sensual experience.

   887. sensuous (adj.) involving sensory gratification

   For Bobby and Jean, holding hands turned out to be more of a sensual experience than either of them had thought.

   888. serendipity (n.) luck, finding good things without looking for them

   Saturday was truly the day of serendipity; for, I found a large diamond ring in the sand at the beach and a twenty dollar billon my way home.

   889. serene (adj.) calm, untroubled

   The late night beach is one of the most serene places on the planet, especially when the seas are calm.

   890. servile (adj.) subservient

   Because humble people have servile natures, they make incredibly faithful servants.

   891. sinuous (adj.) lithe, serpentine

   With the sinuous movements of her entire body, the nimble dancer moved like a quiet twisting stream flowing to the ocean.

   892. sobriety (n.) sedate, calm

   Failing his at-the-scene sobriety test, poor Nicholas spent yet another night in jail.

   893. solicitous (adj.) concerned, attentive

   The ailing patient really needed the solicitous attention he got from all the nurses on duty.

   894. solipsistic (adj.) believing that oneself is all that exists
   The solipsistic attitude of some of the super rich causes them to ignore the plight of the poor, and sometimes to even blame the poor for their
   condition at birth.

   895. soluble (adj.) able to dissolve

   Salt is a very soluble substance, disappearing in water with just the slightest agitation.

   896. solvent a. (n.) substances that dissolve other substances ; b. (adj.) able to pay debts

   a.) The scientist knew once she added the solvent, the reaction would spontaneously occur.

   b.) After a sales breakthrough, the shop owner became solvent enough to catch up on all of his debts.

   897. somnolent (adj.) sleepy, drowsy

   Long tests, hot days, and somnolent students seldom make for happy teachers.

   898. sophomoric (adj.) immature, uninformed

   The freshmen thought the pledging requisites were sophomoric, and therefore chose not to pledge.

   899. sovereign (adj.) having absolute authority in a certain realm

   Caesar of Rome was an absolute sovereign, ordering men to their deaths as he saw fit.

   900. speculative (adj.) not based in fact

   Gladly, Theresa was convinced to go at least part way with that speculative venture; thus, today, she is part way rich.

   901. spurious (adj.) false but designed to seem plausible

   The researcher's evidence was contrived and spurious, seeming to solve genuine problems, but failing during the different-laboratory re-testing
   stage.

   902. stagnate (v.) to become or remain inactive, not develop, not flow

   With no room to flow, the once pure waters stagnated and became a hatchery for mosquitoes and biting flies.

   903. staid (adj.) sedate, serious, self-restrained

   The staid manner of the new boss infused the heretofore footloose and fancy free company with a dose of seriousness that it sorely needed.

   904. stingy (adj.) not generous, not inclined to spend or give

   The stingy man would only pay the teenager fifty cents for cutting his two-acre lawn.

   905. stoic (adj.) unaffected by passion or feeling

   The best judges around tend to be stoic in their manner and in the ultimate decisions that they render.

   906. stolid (adj.) expressing little sensibility, unemotional

   The convicted men stood there, stolid and resigned to his fate.

   907. strenuous (adj.) requiring tremendous energy or stamina

   Seemingly, weight lifters must do strenuous exercises every time they work out.

   908. strident (adj.) harsh, loud

   My fourth hour teacher is the most strident person in the world, yelling at and accusing her students constantly.

   909. stupefy (v.) to astonish, make insensible

   Ronica’s incredible talents tend to stupefy all who see her, rendering them speechless.

   910. subjugate (v.) to bring under control, subdue

   The conquering general had no desire to kill the inhabitants of his new realm; he wanted more than anything else to subjugate them and use them
   as a labor force.

   911. sublime (adj.) lofty, grand, exalted

   The show went from the sublime to the ridiculous when the incredible singer gave way to a not-so-incredible boys' rap band.

   912. submissive (adj.) easily yielding to authority

   Submissive men tend to become henpecked husbands, giving the rest of the gender bearers a bad reputation.

   913. succinct (adj.) marked by compact precision
   The mayor’s succinct speech was a bit hard to hear; for she spoke of tax increases and layoffs.

   914. superfluous (adj.) exceeding what is necessary

   After everyone has gotten their agreed-upon portion, everything else can be considered superfluous and given to those in need.

   915. surfeit (n.) an overabundant supply or indulgence

   Having a surfeit of nutritious food makes it obligatory to feed the starving children.

   916. surmise (v.) to infer with little evidence

   After hearing Harold's not-so-convincing reasons for being absent, and glancing at his overall work record, I was able to surmise that his
   absences were indeed habitual.

   917. surreptitious (adj.) stealthy

   The thief crept surreptitiously toward the back door, intending on slipping in while others were preoccupied with pleasures.

   918. surrogate (n.) one acting in place of another

   Brenda, a surrogate, carried the child to term for its biological mother, Lucy.

   919. swarthy (adj.) of dark color or complexion

   A swarthy gentlemen stood up and gestured toward a photo of an African gentleman, and said, "For my father's sake, I'll not resign; but, some
   things must change."

   920. sycophant (n.) one who flatters for self-gain

   Most in-the-know bosses recognize sycophants a mile away, and give them cursory attention at best.

                                                                         T --

   921. tacit (adj.) expressed without words

   Without a word ever being spoken, Wade tacitly communed with LeBron, and tossed the perfect lob for a monster slam dunk.

   922. taciturn (adj.) not inclined to talk; peevish

   The taciturn youngster just sat, gazing into nothingness, obviously disturbed by something.

   923. tangential (adj.) incidental, peripheral, divergent

   Trying to avoid the direct answers that would expose him, the clever defendant became ever more tangential in his responses.

   924. tantamount (adj.) equivalent in value or significance

   Leaving work without permission is tantamount to quitting; for, you can never return.

   925. tedious (adj.) dull, boring

   Licking and stamping envelopes for five hours is the most tedious job I can imagine.

   926. temerity (n.) audacity, recklessness

   The soldier's temerity was lauded by his comrades, but it was chided by his superiors.

   927. temperance (n.) moderation in action or thought

   Those who meditate tend to develop great temperance, remaining calm in the most distressing of circumstances.

   928. tenable (adj.) able to be defended or maintained

   I'm seeking a relationship that can be tenable even over great distances.

   929. tenuous (adj.) having little substance or strength

   My employment is tenuous at best; being late is something I better avoid at all costs.

   930. terrestrial (adj.) relating to the land

   Because hippopotami are only semi-terrestrial, they must be semi-aquatic also.

   931. timorous (adj.) timid, fearful

   Marcus, being the timorous lad that he is, imagined himself asking Linda out, but never found the boldness to actually do it.

   932. tirade (n.) a long speech marked by harsh or biting language

   Listening to the boss's tirade about tardiness, every wise employee started to report an hour early every day.

   933. toady (n.) one who flatters in the hope of gaining favors

   Being a toady is the easiest way in the world to become hated by all.

   934. tome (n.) a large book

   Bookworms are literally at home in a tome.

   935. torpid (adj.) lethargic, dormant, lacking motion

   The torpid kid just sat on his soft sofa and ate chips and watched television all day.

   936. torrid (adj.) giving off intense heat, passionate

   No one will be able to maintain such a torrid pace for 26 miles!

   937. tortuous (adj.) winding

   The tortuous streets help to keep the speeders under 50 mph, which is a good thing.

   938. tractable (adj.) easily controlled

   Small children are extremely tractable when the proper motivation is used.

   939. tranquil (adj.) calm

   The lazy river scene was especially tranquil; even the currents seemed to take it easy and coast.

   940. transgress (v.) to violate, go over a limit

   "Sinners are those who transgress God's laws of righteousness!" proclaimed the fiery preacher.

   941. transient (adj.) passing through briefly; moving in and out of existence

   The spirit of youth doesn't have to pass like youth itself; for, the spirit is not transient.

   942. transmute (v.) to change or alter in form

   Metamorphosis is a transmutation from one form of a creature to another.

   943. travesty (n.) a grossly inferior imitation

   "That verdict was nothing short of a travesty of justice!" screamed the defense attorney.

   944. tremulous (adj.) fearful

   Seeing the creature that wasn't supposed to even exist made everyone tremulous and uncertain.

   945. trenchant (adj.) effective, articulate, clear-cut

   The how-to directions that came with my speed bike were not trenchant and proved very difficult to follow.

   946. trepidation (n.) fear, apprehension

   Nolan's trepidations surged when he saw that wall of water approaching the beach.

   947. trite (adj.) not original, overused

   Every knock-knock joke should be banned from use and considered trite by all serious comedians.

   948. truculent (adj.) ready to fight, cruel

   Boxing, more-so than most other sports, is a test of truculent prowess.

   949. truncate (v.) to shorten by cutting off

   Craig tried so hard to get his brother to truncate his long, boring speech, but to no avail.

   950. turgid (adj.) swollen, excessively embellished in style or language

   Some young writers attempt to be impressive by using turgid language where none is required.

   951. turpitude (n.) depravity, moral corruption

   There are certain cities in the world that cater to the turpitude that's rampant in our society.

                                                                         U --

   952. ubiquitous (adj.) existing everywhere, widespread

   Going through the fields, the brier bobs seemed ubiquitous, sticking us at every turn.

   953. umbrage (n.) resentment, offense

   Uncontrolled opinion offering can and will result in umbrage being taken at some point.

   954. uncanny (adj.) of supernatural character or origin

   It's uncanny how the skilled magicians can make things seem to float without using any apparatus.

   955. unctuous (adj.) smooth or greasy in texture, appearance, manner

   The slick politician struck all of the audience members as unctuous and underhanded.

   956. undulate (v.) to move in waves

   As the waves picked up, that little skiff started to undulate like a bream cork.

   957. upbraid (v.) to criticize or scold severely

   The parents started to upbraid the mischievous teens for skipping school and going to the mall.

   958. usurp (v.) to seize by force, take possession of without right

   The young prince dreamed of usurping his father's position and sitting comfortably on his throne.

   959. utilitarian (adj.) relating to or aiming at usefulness

   We were told to buy only utilitarian items, nothing that was pretty but has no practical use.

   960. utopia (n.) an imaginary and remote place of perfection

   In the middle of the Amazonian Jungle, there's a legendary city called Utopia.

                                                                         V --

   961. vacillate (v.) to fluctuate, hesitate

   When the stakes went up, some of the players lost their aggressiveness and started to vacillate.

   962. vacuous (adj.) lack of content or ideas, stupid

   After being asked several hard questions in a row, and missing them all, Cloe seemed vacuous to those watching.

   963. validate (v.) to confirm, support, corroborate

   The numbers were presented by Dr. Lewis, but they needed to be validated independently by someone else.

   964. vapid (adj.) lacking liveliness, dull

   The latest rendition of Star Battles is reported to be vapid, lacking any real intrigue.

   965. variegated (adj.) diversified, distinctly marked

   The variegated patterns on the python make it one of the most beautiful creatures in nature.

   966. vehemently (adv.) marked by intense force or emotion
   "I vehemently oppose any and all changes at this point!" shouted Mayor Todd.

   967. veneer (n.) a superficial or deceptively attractive appearance, façade

   Beneath that veneer of politeness and manners, beats a heart that is willing to kill.

   968. venerable (adj.) deserving of respect because of age or achievement

   The professor emeritus was a venerable scholar; everyone listened to his every word.

   969. venerate (v.) to regard with respect or to honor

   The children were taught to venerate their leader from the crib up.

   970. veracity (n.) truthfulness, accuracy

   Doubting the veracity of the victim's claim, the insurance adjuster interviewed the officer again who wrote up the incident.

   971. verbose (adj.) wordy, impaired by wordiness , loud

   One of the major afflictions of most politicians is the inclination to be verbose.

   972. verdant (adj.) green in tint or color

   During late spring, the vales and glens of Westhighland are lush and verdant.

   973. vestige (n.) a mark or trace of something lost or vanished

   The annihilation was absolute, leaving not a vestige of that ancient civilization.

   974. vex (v.) to confuse or annoy

   About fifteen minutes after nightfall, the mosquitoes begin to vex every warm-blooded creature in the woods.

   975. vicarious (adj.) experiencing through another

   Readers have discovered that they can travel to exotic lands vicariously through the fascinating characters they read about.

   976. vicissitude (n.) event that occurs by chance and brings heart-ship or pain

   The vicissitude of the hike began to afflict him, especially when the trail wound uphill.

   977. vigilant (adj.) watchful, alert

   The vigilant watchman was on full alert, and saw the invaders as they stepped upon the king's shore.

   978. vilify (v.) to lower in importance, defame

   The article truly vilified the whole team, blaming all of them for the brutal post-game fight .

   979. vindicate (v.) to avenge; to free from allegation; to set free

   After new evidence was introduced, the accused man was found innocent of all charges, vindicated from any possibility of punishment.

   980. vindictive (adj.) vengeful

   When the vindictive felon was finally released from prison, he immediately sought to afflict those who'd put him there.

   981. virtuoso (n.) one who excels in an art; a highly skilled musical performer

   Maestro Bland is a true virtuoso, playing with unique skill every instrument in the orchestra.

   982. viscous (adj.) not free flowing, syrupy

   Once blood chills, it can become as viscous as maple syrup.

   983. vitriolic (adj.) having a caustic quality

   When angered, Thelma Lou would spew out vitriolic characterizations of everybody she knew.

   984. vituperate (v.) to berate

   The embarrassed coach began to vituperate his seniors for allowing themselves to be beaten by the girls' team.

   985. vivacious (adj.) lively, sprightly

   The vivacious cheerleaders shouted and bounced about during the whole game.

   986. vocation (n.) the work in which someone is employed, profession

   The vocation in life is teaching school; but, my passion is catching fish.

   987. vociferous (adj.) loud, boisterous

   The ring master was so vociferous that he didn't need his megaphone to be powered.

                                                                         W --

   988. wallow (v.) to roll oneself indolently; to become or remain helpless

   After wallowing in self-pity all weekend, Charles got up, washed his face, and marched out to meet life, planning to conquer whatever got in his
   way.

   989. wane (v.) to decrease in size, dwindle

   After not eating for three full days, Bert's strength began to wane.

   990. wanton (adj.) undisciplined, lewd, lustful

   Geraldine's wanton manner often made her minister cringe with distress.

   991. whimsical (adj.) fanciful, full of whims

   The whimsical little Annie liked to pretend that she was a beautiful princess, waiting to be rescued from the clutches of the black knight.

   992. wily (adj.) crafty, sly

   In nature, once an animal escapes an attacker's first assault, it becomes much more wily and cunning.

   993. winsome (adj.) charming, pleasing

   The winsome host charmed his guests with his wit, his smile, and his tacit glances.

   994. wistful (adj.) full of yearning; musingly sad

   As Charlotte thought back on her last summer of fun, she became wistful, and longed for one more hour of joy.

   995. wizened (adj.) dry, shrunken, wrinkled

   The wizened matriarch rose from her throne, and spoke with the raspy voice of years, saying, "My children, love each other always."

   996. wrath (n.) vengeful anger, punishment

   It will one day be a day of retribution when the wrath of the king is meted out upon all who speak his name in vain.

                                                                         Y --

   997. yoke (v.) to join, link

   The oxen were yoked together because the field was almost petrified from lack of rain.

                                                                         Z --

   998. zealous (adj.) fervent, filled with eagerness in pursuit of something

   The zealous young apprentice spent the night at his desk, trying to learn everything in a day.

   999. zenith (n.) the highest point, culminating point

   At the zenith of the physical maturity, Clark was able to lift a thousand pounds above his head.

   1000. zephyr (n.) a gentle breeze

   "If Zephyr favors us, we shall make port by nightfall," Captain Longfellow announced.

   {cmp_end}{idkey=5371b1[url=http%3A%2F%2Fenglishtestprepreview.com%2Fielts-english-strategies-to-know%2Fielts-vocabulary-strategies%2F736-tips-and-strategies%2Fenglish-tips-strategies%2Fenglish-vocabulary-strategies%2F1081-1000-words-you-must-know][title=1000+Words+You+Must+Know][desc=]}

     * Next >

  IELTS Home || Mini Study Guide & Practice

     * IELTS Basics

          * IELTS Overview
          * IELTS Academic or General Test
          * Learn IELTS Core Strategies in One Hour
          * IELTS Study Plans: One Month, Two Month and Four Month
          * IELTS Reading & Writing Foundation Skills to Master
          * IELTS Listening & Speaking Foundation Skills to Master

     * IELTS Listening

          * IELTS Listening Module

     * IELTS Speaking

          * IELTS Speech Samples - Text
          * IELTS Speaking Sample Topics Part 1
          * IELTS Speaking Example Topics Part 2

     * IELTS - Check Your English & Practice

          * List: Check Your English Tests
          * IELTS Listening Practice
          * IELTS Speaking Practice
          * IELTS Writing - Sentence Correction
          * IELTS Writing - Sentence Improvement
          * IELTS Writing: Paragraph Improvement
          * IELTS Writing: Essay Improvement Practice
          * IELTS Reading Comprehension
          * IELTS Vocabulary Test

     * IELTS Top 10 Tips

          * IELTS Listening Tips
          * IELTS Speaking Tips
          * IELTS Letter Tips

     * IELTS Letter Samples

          * IELTS Letter Samples

     * IELTS Essay Samples

          * IELTS Essay Topics
          * IELTS Essay Samples

     * IELTS English Strategies to Know

          * List: IELTS English Strategies
          * IELTS Vocabulary Strategies
          * IELTS Reading Strategies
          * IELTS Writing Strategies
          * IELTS Grammar Strategies
          * IELTS Top Essay Examples to Know
          * IELTS Essay Strategies
          * IELTS Spelling Strategies

     * IELTS Official Sample Tests

          * IELTS Practice Tests Introduction
          * IELTS Past Practice Test1
          * Audio: IELTS PracticeTest1 Audio
          * IELTS Past Practice Test 2
          * Audio: IELTS Practice Test2 Audio
          * IELTS Past Practice Test 3
          * Audio: IELTS Practice Test 3 Audio
          * IELTS Past Practice Test 4
          * Audio: IELTS Practice Test4 Audio
          * IELTS General Training Module Practice Test 1
          * IELTS Test 1-4 Answers
          * IELTS Practice Tests 1-4 Transcripts
          * Test a Module to see if renders properly

  Learn Grammar for Writing in 30 Days

     * English3.org

  Top 3 Products for the IELTS

     * English3.org  — to learn IELTS gramamr and writing in 30 days
     * Barron's IETLS — for the best listening / speaking sections
     * Coming!

